Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Text of "State Program for the Privatization of State and </F>
Municipal Enterprises in the Russian Federation"] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  1. Introduction </H5>
  The State Program for the Privatization of State and 
Municipal Enterprises in the Russian Federation (hereinafter 
referred to as the Program) is a federal program in the field of 
the economic and social development of the Russian Federation 
elaborated in accordance with the requirements of the Russian 
Federation Law "On the Privatization of State and Municipal 
Enterprises in the Russian Federation" taking account of the 
experience and results of privatization conducted in 1992-1993. 
  The program sets the objectives, targets, priorities, 
limitations, and procedures for privatization. 
  Broad interpretation of the restrictions on privatization 
indicated in the Program, and also in local privatization 
programs, is not permitted. 
  The main objectives of the Program are: 
  --the formation of a broad stratum of private property 
owners 
as the economic basis of market relations; 
  --the involvement in the privatization process of the 
broadest possible strata of the population through the sale of 
privatizable state and municipal property for privatization 
checks at specialized check auctions prior to 1 July 1994 and 
for money at auctions after 1 July 1994; 
  --the completion of privatization involving the use of 
privatization checks; 
  --the completion of the privatization of most "small-scale 
privatization" facilities and the acceleration on this basis of 
the development of the trade and services sphere; 
  --the completion in the main of the privatization of large 
and medium-sized enterprises in industry and construction and 
the improvement of the performance of enterprises and the 
national economy as a whole on the basis of the implementation 
of structural restructuring of the economy, the development of 
post-privatization support for enterprises, the creation of a 
competitive environment, and the development of the capital 
market; 
  --the attraction of investment, including foreign 
investment, 
into production; 
  --assistance in the implementation of measures to provide 
social support for the population, including the protection of 
the rights of private property owners (stockholders). 
  Facilities and enterprises in federal, state, and municipal 
ownership are divided into the following groups on the basis of 
their suitability for privatization: 
  --facilities and enterprises in federal ownership whose 
privatization is prohibited; 
  --facilities and enterprises in federal ownership whose 
privatization is effected by Russian Federation Government 
decision; 
  --facilities and enterprises whose privatization is effected 
by decision of the Russian Federation State Committee for the 
Management of State Property (hereinafter referred to as the 
Russian Goskomimushchestvo) taking account of the opinion of 
sector ministries; 
  --facilities and enterprises in state (municipal) ownership 
whose privatization is effected in accordance with the Program 
by decision of organs of state power and administration of the 
republics within the Russian Federation, krays, oblasts, the 
autonomous oblast, autonomous okrugs, and the cities of Moscow 
and St. Petersburg and with local privatization programs; 
  facilities and enterprises in federal or state (municipal) 
ownership subject to compulsory privatization. 
  The privatization of facilities and enterprises in federal 
or 
state (municipal) ownership which are not included in the 
targets and are not subject to restrictions on privatization is 
effected on the on the basis of decisions by territorial 
property management committees or of privatization applications 
submitted by any persons. 
  In the event that an application for the privatization of an 
enterprise is submitted by the labor collective or by any 
individual or corporate third party acknowledged as the 
purchaser in the privatization process, the appropriate property 
management committee is obligated to adopt a decision on the 
privatization of the enterprise and must mandatorily inform the 
applicant of the decision adopted. 
  The privatization of state and municipal educational 
establishments is governed by the relevant legislation. 
  Pending the adoption of a law or other Russian Federation 
legislative act, health-care institutions and enterprises, and 
also pharmacies, are privatized in accordance with a special 
procedure to be approved by the Russian Federation Government. 
  Questions relating to the privatization of facilities in the 
ownership of republics within the Russian Federation, krays, 
oblasts, the autonomous oblast, autonomous okrugs, and the 
cities of Moscow and St. Petersburg and also of facilities in 
municipal ownership are decided by the components of the Russian 
Federation on the basis of Russian Federation privatization 
legislation, including the features, restrictions, and 
principles defined by the present Program. 
  Fulfillment of the requirements laid down by the Program is 
mandatory for federal organs of administration; organs of state 
power and administration of the republics within the Russian 
Federation, krays, oblasts, the autonomous oblast, autonomous 
okrugs, and the cities of Moscow and St. Petersburg; and organs 
of local self-government. 
<H3>  2. Classification of Facilities and Enterprises According to 
Their Suitability for Privatization </H3>
<H3>  2.1. Facilities and Enterprises in Federal Ownership Whose 
Privatization Is Prohibited </H3>
  2.1.1. The mineral resources, forests, water resources, 
airspace, and resources of the continental shelf, territorial 
waters, and maritime economic zone of the Russian Federation; 
frequencies and orbits available to space systems 
  2.1.2. Natural territories that are protected or under 
special use, with the immovable facilities located there. 
  2.1.3. The resources of the Russian Federation republic 
budget, the Russian Federation Republic Currency Reserve, the 
Russian Federation Pensions Fund, the Russian Federation Fund 
for Social Insurance, Employment, and Social Support for the 
Population, and other state extrabudgetary funds, and of the 
Central Bank of the Russian Federation; the Russian Federation 
State Precious Metals and Precious Stones Fund, including the 
Russian Federation Diamonds Fund and the gold reserve of the 
Russian Federation. 
  2.1.4. The Central Bank of the Russian Federation and 
enterprises responsible for the production and storage of bank 
notes, state treasury notes, bonds, and other state securities. 
  2.1.5. Authorized and standard-issue military and other 
property (including arsenals) under the operational control of 
the Russian Federation Armed Forces, the Russian Federation 
Federal Counterintelligence Service, the Russian Federation 
Defense Ministry, the Russian Federation Internal Affairs 
Ministry, the Federal Government Communications and Information 
Agency under the Russian Federation president, their troops, and 
other ministries and departments having military formations; the 
property of military-construction directorates and troop units 
of the Federal Administration for Special Construction under the 
Russian Federation Government and the Federal Specialized 
Administration for Construction in Eastern Regions of the 
Russian Federation under the Russian Federation State Committee 
for Questions of Architecture and Construction. Special testing 
ranges for testing arms and military equipment. 
  2.1.6. Institutions and organizations which are more than 50 
percent financed out of the Russian Federation republic budget. 
  2.1.7. Movable and immovable assets belonging to the 
historical and cultural heritage of federal significance, on the 
basis of the list approved by the Russian Federation Government. 
  2.1.8. Enterprises and facilities of the hydrogeological 
service of the Russian Federation Ministry of Health; services 
for monitoring the state of the natural environment and nature 
conservation, including zonal institutes and enterprises of the 
Russian Scientific Research, Planning, and Prospecting 
Association for the Utilization of Land Resources; the 
All-Russia Institute of Agricultural Aerophotogeophysical 
Surveys and its zonal branches; the Russian Center for 
Scientific Support for Land Reform; the Russian Institute of 
Monitoring of Land and Ecosystems and its zonal institutes. 
  2.1.9. Enterprises, organizations, and facilities in the 
scientific and technical sphere under the Russian Federation 
state health and epidemiological service, the veterinary 
service, the service for the protection of plants and the 
protection and reproduction of game stocks; laboratory animal 
breeding centers. 
  2.1.10. Water resources and land reclamation systems and 
installations; organizations for oversight of the condition of 
reclaimed land. 
  2.1.11. Railroads and railroad transportation facilities and 
property directly involved in the transportation process and in 
emergency repair work. 
  2.1.12. Enterprises for the manufacture of state insignia. 
  2.1.13. Enterprises and facilities in the scientific and 
technical sphere carrying out the development, production, and 
sale of narcotic substances or the sowing, cultivation, and 
processing of crops containing such substances, including hemp 
processing enterprises. 
  2.1.14. Port hydrotechnical installations and facilities, 
including those serving the Northern Sea Route; the nuclear, 
educational, hydrographical, and icebreaker fleet; equipment 
used for rescue operations and the elimination of oil spills at 
sea; facilities and installations belonging to shipping traffic 
control systems and port oversight inspectorates; the "Atomflot" 
technical maintenance enterprise; and the property of production 
associations of waterways and canals, detachments of the 
Podvodrechstroy [Ministry of the River Fleet Underwater 
Technical and Construction Operations Administration], and 
navigation inspectorates. 
  2.1.15. Organizations and facilities of the maritime 
accident 
rescue service and maritime and river transport 
electroradionavigation and technical communications. 
  2.1.16. Facilities, enterprises, and equipment for the 
burial 
of solid and liquid radioactive and toxic chemical waste; animal 
refuse burial grounds. 
  2.1.17. Facilities and enterprises of the Russian Federation 
Internal Affairs Ministry, the Russian Federation Federal 
Counterintelligence Service, the Russian Federation Defense 
Ministry, and the Russian Federation State Customs Committee, 
and enterprises created to provide support for the activities of 
federal organs of power and administration of the Russian 
Federation and for the Russian Federation Border Forces. 
  2.1.18. Nuclear [power] stations and enterprises for the 
production of special nuclear and radioactive materials and 
nuclear weapons; enterprises carrying out scientific research, 
experimental, and design work in the said spheres. 
  2.1.19. Residential social services facilities, including 
children's homes and orphanages, the Scientific Research 
Institute of Prosthetics and Prosthesis Building, the Scientific 
Research Institute for the Study of Fitness for Work and the 
Organization of Disabled People's Labor, the medical experts 
further training institute, and territorial social services 
centers; boarding schools for orphans and children without 
parental care; boarding schools for children with mental and 
physical developmental deficiencies; homes for the elderly; 
nursing homes, boarding houses, hospitals, sanatoriums, and 
homes for disabled people, children, and the elderly; 
prosthetics and orthopedics enterprises, including scientific 
research institutes in the sphere of prosthetics and orthopedics 
engaged in the manufacture of output and the provision of 
services for disabled people with damage to the motor-skeletal 
system. 
  2.1.20. Facilities, enterprises, and systems and means of 
air 
traffic control of airports and aviation enterprises connected 
with ensuring a unified system of air traffic control of the 
lower and upper airspace; airfields of federal significance 
(categories A, B, C, D, and E, under the accepted 
classification), metrological centers and flight test stations, 
and training centers in civil aviation. 
  2.1.21. Facilities and enterprises for which closed 
administrative-territorial formations have been set up to ensure 
their security, on the basis of the list approved by the Russian 
Federation Government. 
  2.1.22. State seed inspectorates, selection and hybrid 
centers, laboratories for varietal testing of agricultural 
crops, varietal testing stations and plots, flax and hemp seed 
raising stations, planning and survey centers of the 
agrichemical service, centers for the use of chemicals and 
agricultural radiology, farms for the production of valuable and 
anadromous types of fish, reservoir agencies for the protection 
and reproduction of fish stocks, state fish selection and 
breeding plants and farms, state stables and race tracks of 
federal significance, and laboratory animal breeding centers. 
  2.1.23. State reserve stocks, bases of the Russian 
Federation 
Committee for State Reserves, and its other facilities 
designated for the storage and servicing of material assets of 
the state reserve; mobilization reserves (when enterprises are 
privatized, such reserves are excluded from their property in 
accordance with the standard contract approved by the Russian 
Goskomimushchestvo by agreement with the Russian Defense 
Ministry and the Russian Ministry of the Economy). 
  2.1.24. Facilities and enterprises of the Federal Postal 
Communications Administration under the Russian Federation 
Ministry of Communications. 
  2.1.25. Facilities and enterprises subordinate to the 
Russian 
Federation State Committee for Statistics. 
  2.1.26. The technical documentation insurance fund. 
  2.1.27. Scientific and technical information organs and 
scientific and technical libraries engaging in the collection, 
processing, storage, and utilization of state information 
resources relating to Russia's scientific and technical 
development; state archives and foundations. 
  2.1.28. Enterprises and facilities of the Russian Federal 
Service for Hydrometeorology and Environmental Monitoring and 
the Russian Federal Geodesy and Cartography Service ensuring the 
standardization of the technical procedure for making 
observations and preparing information. 
  2.1.29. Facilities and enterprises belonging to the system 
of 
the Federal Administration for Biomedical and Survival Problems 
under the Russian Federation Ministry of Health. 
  2.1.30. Paramilitary mountain rescue units and gas rescue 
and 
gusher control services and specialized subunits, including 
those for the control of emergencies, natural disasters, and 
radiation disasters. 
  2.1.31. Physical fitness and sports facilities used for 
training national teams. 
  2.1.32. Facilities and enterprises for the grading of 
precious stones and refining plants (shops and production units). 
  2.1.33. Enterprises and facilities in the scientific and 
experimental production spheres forming part of the Russian 
Academy of Sciences, the Russian Academy of Agricultural 
Sciences, the Russian Academy of Medical Sciences, the Russian 
Academy of Education, and the Russian Academy of Arts which were 
transferred to the said academies under the established 
procedure in line with edicts of the Russian Federation 
president on the basis of lists approved by the Council of 
Ministers-Government of the Russian Federation. 
  2.1.34. Radio and television transmission centers and radio 
centers (including technical facilities and installations other 
than those forming part of the property of enterprises eligible 
for privatization). 
  2.1.35. Enterprises engaged in the development and 
production 
of cipher equipment. 
  2.1.36. Facilities in the scientific and technical sphere 
carrying out research in nature conservation and ecological 
monitoring under the Russian Federation Ministry of Environment 
and Natural Resources. 
  2.1.37. Protected facilities of organs of state 
administration, civil defense protective installations, and the 
material assets belonging to the latter category and separately 
located specialized warehouse facilities for their storage. 
  2.1.38. Federal motor roads for general use and 
organizations 
carrying out their maintenance. 
  2.1.39. Facilities in the nonproduction sphere that are 
under 
the jurisdiction of federal organs of representative power. 
  2.1.40. Facilities and enterprises for the development and 
production of immunobiological preparations that are under the 
jurisdiction of the Russian Federation Ministry of Health. 
  2.1.41. Institutes for the training and further training of 
personnel for sector ministries and departments. 
  2.1.42. Crematoriums and cemeteries. 
  2.1.43. Enterprises, facilities, and organizations of the 
geological service which carry out regional geological studies 
in connection with state defense needs or operations on the 
continental shelf and within the maritime economic zone or in 
the world's oceans, including seagoing vessels intended for this 
purpose, as well as those that carry out fundamental scientific 
research, experimental, and design work aimed at fulfilling 
federal programs for the development of the country's minerals 
and raw materials base, in accordance with the special list 
approved by edict of the Russian Federation president; deep 
boreholes located within the limits of mining concessions or 
areas for which licenses have been issued to extraction or other 
enterprises; the state network of observation boreholes and 
centers for the observation of oil and gas gushers. 
  2.1.44. The subway. Note: At enterprises included in 
Section 2.1 of the Program, the privatization of individual 
production units not associated with the production of special 
output may be permitted by decision of the Russian Federation 
Government. 
<H3>  2.2. Facilities and Enterprises in Federal Ownership Whose 
Privatization Is Effected by Russian Federation Government 
Decision </H3>
  2.2.1. Facilities and enterprises for the manufacture and 
maintenance of all types of arms systems and components, 
including the manufacture of single-use subassemblies and 
components, and for the production of space devices, explosives, 
pyrotechnics, and special-purpose chemicals; scientific research 
facilities working on the development of the said items (other 
than those indicated in Section 2.1 of the Program). 
  2.2.2. Civil defense facilities (other than those indicated 
in Section 2.1 of the Program). 
  2.2.3. Specialized cold stores responsible for the permanent 
housing of state reserves, the formation of federal food stocks, 
and the storage of mobilization reserves (other than those 
indicated in Section 2.1 of the Program). 
  2.2.4. Facilities and enterprises for the processing of 
precious metal ores, precious and semiprecious stones, and 
radioactive and rare-earth elements (other than those indicated 
in Section 2.1 of the Program). 
  2.2.5. Enterprises and associations of the fuel and energy 
complex (with the exception of construction organizations and 
construction industry enterprises), including electricity 
generation enterprises, coal, petroleum, and gas extraction and 
refining enterprises, petro-geophysics and petroleum product 
support services enterprises, nuclear [power] stations, and 
pipeline transportation facilities and enterprises. 
  2.2.6. Railroad transportation enterprises and facilities 
and 
maritime and aviation transportation enterprises of federal 
significance (other than those indicated in Sections 2.1 and 2.4 
of the Program). 
  2.2.7. The scientific research fleet of fisheries survey 
administrations; maritime fishing ports. 
  2.2.8. Commercial banks (their privatization is effected 
under a special procedure to be approved by the Russian 
Federation Government on the basis of agreed proposals of the 
Russian Goskomimushchestvo, the Russian Ministry of Finance, and 
the Russian Ministry of the Economy). 
  2.2.9. Communications enterprises (other than enterprises of 
the "Rospechat" [Russian Main Administration for the 
Distribution of Printed Materials] retail network and 
enterprises indicated in Section 2.1 of the Program), including 
scientific research, planning, and design enterprises and 
organizations and their experimental enterprises and testing 
grounds; institutions of the Russian Federation Committee for 
Information Science. 
  2.2.10. News agencies and television and radio broadcasting 
companies. 
  2.2.11. Facilities and enterprises of sociocultural 
significance (including theaters, movie, concert, and exhibition 
halls, movie studios and movie re-recording factories, and 
physical fitness and sports facilities). 
  2.2.12. Foreign trade associations of the Russian Federation 
Ministry of Foreign Economic Relations and other Russian 
Federation ministries and departments, unless otherwise 
stipulated in Russian Federation legislation. 
  2.2.13. Facilities and enterprises carrying out the 
operation 
and maintenance of gas facilities which are of all-Russian and 
interregional significance. 
  2.2.14. Movable and immovable assets belonging to the 
historical and cultural heritage (other than those indicated in 
Section 2.1 of the Program) which have been placed on the 
state's books, as well as those kept in the stocks of state and 
municipal museums, archives and libraries, and picture galleries 
and in the display cabinets of art industry enterprises and 
traditional folk industries, including the premises and 
buildings in which they are located. 
  2.2.15. Printing enterprises, publishing houses, and 
wholesale book trade enterprises under the jurisdiction of the 
Russian Federation Committee on the Press, the Russian 
Federation Ministry of Social Protection of the Population, and 
the Russian Federation Ministry of Health. 
  2.2.16. Enterprises and facilities in the scientific and 
technical sphere belonging to the system of the Russian 
Federation Committee on Standardization, Metrology, and 
Certification; machine testing stations. 
  2.2.17. State sanatorium and resort facilities under the 
jurisdiction of the Russian Federation Ministry of Social 
Protection of the Population and the Russian Federation Ministry 
of Health. 
  2.2.18. Enterprises and facilities of the Republic (Federal) 
Social Support Fund. 
  2.2.19. Forestry enterprises and forestry protection air 
bases; facilities in the scientific and technical sphere 
belonging to the system of the Russian Federal Forestry Service. 
  2.2.20. Enterprises and facilities belonging to the system 
of 
the Water Resources Committee under the Russian Federation 
Government. 
  2.2.21. Surplus movable and immovable property (with the 
exception of arms and ammunition) under the operational control 
of the Russian Federation Armed Forces, the Russian Federation 
Federal Counterintelligence Service, the Russian Federation 
Defense Ministry, the Russian Federation Internal Affairs 
Ministry, and the Federal Government Communications and 
Information Agency under the Russian Federation president, and 
their troops, and other ministries and departments which have 
military formations; enterprises and associations of these 
ministries and departments that are not engaged in the 
production or maintenance of any type of arms systems or 
components or the production of ammunition, explosives, or 
pyrotechnics (other than those indicated in Section 2.1 of the 
Program, and enterprises of the Russian Federation Federal 
Counterintelligence Service). 
  2.2.22. Enterprises for the production of specialized 
nonnuclear materials. 
  2.2.23. Enterprises of the geological service (other than 
those indicated in Section 2.1 of the Program). 
  2.2.24. Medical industry facilities and enterprises, 
pharmaceutical bases (storehouses) and medical equipment bases 
supplying goods for federal and state needs, and also those 
serving regions of the Far North and equivalent localities 
(other than those indicated in Section 2.1 of the Program). 
  2.2.25. Enterprises and facilities in the scientific and 
technical sphere in the chemicals complex which incorporate 
manufacturing facilities involving toxic substances graded in 
risk categories 1 and 2; production facilities graded in 
explosive risk category 1. 
  2.2.26. Facilities whose construction is financed from the 
federal budget (other than those indicated in Section 2.5 of the 
Program). 
  2.2.27. Extraction industry facilities and enterprises of 
federal significance, including the salt industry (with the 
exception of facilities and enterprises which recover local raw 
materials and those that carry out timber procurement 
operations, including the recovery of tar-impregnated wood, 
resin, and barras. 
  2.2.28. Enterprises for the burial of solid industrial and 
household waste. 
  2.2.29. Enterprises and organizations subordinate to the 
Russian Federation Committee on Patents and Trade Marks. 
  2.2.30. Pedigree and stud farms, pedigree stock farms, and 
pedigree stock breeding service enterprises. 
  2.2.31. Subsidiary production farms of the biological 
industry; "Sortsemovoshch" [selected vegetable seed varieties] 
enterprises of the "Rossortsemovoshch" Russian Republican 
Association. 
  2.2.32. State scientific centers on the basis of the list 
approved by the Russian Federation Government. 
  2.2.33. Specialized plants manufacturing components and 
nonstandardized equipment and tools for prosthetic and 
orthopedic enterprises. 
  2.2.34. Nuclear weapon delivery vehicles. 
  2.2.35. Enterprises and facilities of the Russian Federal 
Geodesy and Cartography Service (other than those indicated in 
Section 2.1 of the Program). 
  2.2.36. Enterprises and organizations belonging to the 
Russian Federal Employment Service and financed by the Russian 
Federation State Fund for Employment of the Population. 
<H3>  2.3. Facilities and Enterprises in Federal Ownership Whose 
Privatization Is Effected by Decision of the Russian 
Goskomimushchestvo Taking Account of the Opinion of Sector 
Ministries and Departments </H3>
  2.3.1. Enterprises in all sectors of the national economy 
(not indicated in Sections 2.1 and 2.2 of the Program) which 
account for more than 35 percent of specified goods, operations, 
and services on the federal market. 
  2.3.2. Large enterprises whose fixed capital had a book 
value 
of more than 1 billion rubles [R] on 1 January 1992. 
  2.3.3. Maritime and river transportation enterprises (other 
than those indicated in Section 2.2 of the Program). 
  2.3.4. Scientific research, planning, design, and 
prospecting 
institutes and facilities and experimental production facilities 
whose fixed capital had a book value of more than R1 million on 
1 January 1992 (not indicated in Sections 2.1 and 2.2 of the 
Program). 
  2.3.5. Enterprises for the production, bottling, and 
packaging of spirits, liqueurs, vodkas, wines, and tobacco 
products. 
  2.3.6. Specialized enterprises for the production of baby 
food products. 
  2.3.7. Enterprises and organizations involved in providing 
catering for passengers on ships and at railroad stations, as 
well as workers' provisions for the maritime and river fleet. 
  2.3.8. Wholesale trade enterprises supplying goods for 
federal and state needs and those serving regions of the Far 
North and equivalent localities and the population of closed 
administrative-territorial formations (other than those 
indicated in Section 2.2 of the Program). 
  2.3.9. Printing enterprises and publishing houses (other 
than 
those indicated in Section 2.2 of the Program). 
  2.3.10. Specialized construction organizations carrying out 
the construction of facilities which ensure state security 
(other than those indicated in Sections 2.1 and 2.2 of the 
Program). 
  2.3.11. Facilities and enterprises whose construction and 
modernization is financed from state budget resources earmarked 
under special-purpose federal programs for overcoming the 
consequences of radiation disasters and which are located in 
resettlement zones, zones of residence with the right of 
resettlement, and zones of residence with privileged 
socioeconomic status defined by existing legislation for 
territories subjected to contamination by radionuclides, or 
outside the said zones. 
  2.3.12. Nuclear machine building facilities and enterprises. 
  2.3.13. Enterprises and facilities of the Russian Federal 
Service for Hydrometeorology and Environmental Monitoring (other 
than those indicated in Section 2.1 of the Program). 
  2.3.14. Oil and gas construction enterprises and facilities. 
  2.3.15. Enterprises for the production of construction 
materials and structures which account for more than 30 percent 
of the total volume of construction materials and structures 
produced in the Russian Federation. 
  2.3.16. Enterprises producing specialized equipment for 
cultural institutions. 
  2.3.17. Circus enterprises and organizations belonging to 
the 
"Rossiyskiy Tsirk" ["Russian Circus"] company. 
  2.3.18. Fishing, hunting, and forestry sport establishments; 
wild animal supply associations, holding stations, and catching 
units; fur sovkhozes (fur farms). 
  2.3.19. Specialized elevators and warehouse premises 
responsible for the permanent housing of state reserves, the 
formation of federal stocks, and the storage of mobilization 
reserves (other than those indicated in Section 2.1 of the 
Program). 
  2.3.20. Agrobiological industry facilities and enterprises 
and their subsidiary farms which are under the jurisdiction of 
the Russian Federation Ministry of Agriculture. 
  Procedure for the Adoption of Decisions on the 
Privatization of Facilities and Enterprises Indicated in 
Sections 2.2 and 2.3 of the Program 
  Decisions on the privatization of enterprises indicated in 
Sections 2.2 and 2.3 of the Program are adopted on the basis of 
Russian Federation laws and enactments of the Russian Federation 
president, respectively by the Russian Federation Government and 
the Russian Goskomimushchestvo and its territorial organs. 
  Privatization documents for enterprises in federal ownership 
are submitted to a property management committee with the status 
of a territorial agency of the Russian Goskomimushchestvo; the 
said committee must, within three days, send the documents: 
  --if the enterprise is included in Section 2.2 of the 
Program 
-- to the Russian Goskomimushchestvo, with copies to the 
relevant sector ministry, state committee, committee, and 
financial organ; 
  --if the enterprise is included in Section 2.3 of the 
Program 
-- to the financial organ for the locality in which the 
enterprise is located or registered, with copies and a draft 
decision on privatization to the relevant sector ministry, state 
committee, or committee. 
  Copies of privatization documents are also sent to the 
Russian Federation State Committee for Antimonopoly Policy and 
Support for New Economic Structures or its territorial 
administration, for facilities requiring their agreement; their 
findings are sent within three weeks to the Russian 
Goskomimushchestvo (if the enterprise is included in Section 2.2 
of the Program) or its territorial agency (if the enterprise is 
included in Section 2.3 of the Program). 
  Within two weeks of receiving the documents, sector 
ministries, state committees, and committees submit their 
findings on the expediency of privatization of facilities in 
federal ownership to the organ which is to adopt the decision on 
privatization. 
  For facilities and enterprises indicated in Section 2.3 of 
the Program, in the light of the findings of the relevant 
ministry, the decision on privatization is made by the leader of 
the territorial agency of the Russian Goskomimushchestva within 
one month of the documents being sent to the sector ministries 
and departments. 
  At the expiry of the prescribed period in which ministries, 
state committees, and committees can present conclusions on the 
impossibility of privatization, the leader of the territorial 
agency of the Russian Goskomimushchestvo must adopt a decision 
on privatization. 
  If the territorial agency refuses to carry out privatization 
or if there are disagreements over privatization issues between 
ministries and territorial agencies regarding the facilities and 
enterprises indicated in Section 2.3 of the Program, the Russian 
Goskomimushchestvo is entitled itself to examine the possibility 
of privatizing them in the light of the opinion of sector 
ministries and departments. 
  Regarding the facilities and enterprises indicated in 
Section 
2.2 of the Program, the Russian Goskomimushchestvo submits draft 
directives to the Russian Federation Government within 15 days 
of receiving documents from the territorial agency and the 
conclusions of ministries and departments. 
  Within 10 days (or for military-industrial complex 
enterprises within one month) of receipt the Russian Federation 
Government examines the draft directives and adopts appropriate 
decisions. 
  If within the indicated period the Russian Federation 
Government has not adopted any decisions according to the 
prescribed procedure, the Russian Goskomimushchestvo within one 
month of the expiry of the period for the examination of 
documents by the Russian Federation Government adopts a decision 
on the possibility of privatization and the procedure for 
carrying it out. If the Russian Federation Government adopts 
a negative decision the Russian Goskomimushchestvo within the 
same period sends a copy of the Russian Federation Government 
directive to the relevant territorial agency. 
  In considering the question of the privatization of the 
enterprises indicated in Sections 2.2 and 2.3 the Russian 
Federation Government, the Russian Goskomimushchestvo, and the 
latter's territorial agencies may adopt the following decisions: 
  1. To prohibit privatization. In this case one of the 
following decisions must be adopted: to convert the enterprise 
into an open-type joint-stock company in according with the 
Russian Federation president's Edict No. 721 of 1 July 1992 "On 
Organizational Measures To Reorganize State Enterprises and 
Voluntary Associations of State Enterprises ss Joint-Stock 
Companies," retaining 100 percent of the shares in state 
ownership, or to convert the enterprise into a state institution 
financed from state sources. 
  2. To establish restrictions on privatization exclusively in 
the form of the retention of blocks of ordinary (voting) shares 
(51 percent, 38 percent, or 25.5 percent) in federal ownership 
or in the form of the issue of a "golden share." 
  3. To permit privatization without any restrictions. In 
converting into joint-stock companies the enterprises indicated 
in Sections 2.2 and 2.3, the Russian Federation Government and 
the Russian Goskomimushchestvo determine the aims, terms, and 
periods of the retention of blocks of shares a "golden share" in 
federal ownership in the light of the opinion of sector 
ministries, departments, and organs of state management of 
Russian Federation components. 
  Decisions on retaining blocks of shares in federal ownership 
can be made for a period of no more than three years and only in 
the amounts of 51 percent, 38 percent, and 25.5 percent of 
ordinary (voting) shares regarding enterprises and organizations 
in the following types of activity: 
  --communications; 
  --the generation and distribution of electric power; 
  --the extraction, refining, and sale of petroleum, natural 
gas, and gas condensate; 
  --the extraction and processing of precious metals, precious 
stones, and radioactive and rare-earth elements; 
  --the development, production, and maintenance of armaments, 
military hardware, and ammunition (including chemical and 
bacteriological); 
  --the production of liquor and liqueur and vodka products; 
  --enterprises directly carrying out shipments on water and 
air transportation, and also airports, seaports, and river ports; 
  --the patent service, standardization and metrology; 
  --research and development enterprises; 
  --specialized enterprises for the construction and operation 
of facilities intended to ensure national security; 
  --publishing houses and printing enterprises for the 
production of printed matter included in the volume of 
deliveries for state needs; 
  --pipeline transportation; 
  --circus enterprises and organizations within the 
"Rossiyskiy 
Tsirk" company; 
  --wholesale trade enterprises carrying out purchases for 
state needs and export-import operations in support of 
interstate agreements. 
  The block of shares in privatized enterprises in the 
indicated sectors retained in federal ownership for a period of 
up to three years consists of ordinary shares which remain in 
the possession of the relevant property management committee 
until the expiry of the period indicated in the privatization 
plan or the adoption of a decision on early sale. 
  A decision to retain a block of shares consisting of 51 
percent of ordinary (voting) shares can be made only on the 
basis of an edict of the Russian Federation president; a 
decision on a block consisting of 38 percent of ordinary 
(voting) shares can be made only by the Russian Federation 
Government. In converting into joint-stock companies 
enterprises in which a controlling interest is retained in 
federal ownership for a period of up to three years the Russian 
Federation Government and the Russian Goskomimushchestvo are 
entitled, in accordance with the powers laid down by the State 
Program for the Privatization of State and Municipal Enterprises 
in the Russian Federation, to instruct such persons as they may 
decide, including officials of organs of state administration at 
the submission of the relevant ministries, departments, and 
regions, to represent on a contract basis the state's interests 
on the board of directors of the joint-stock company. Officials 
of organs of state administration appointed under the 
aforementioned procedure to the boards of directors of 
joint-stock companies carry out their activities on an unpaid 
basis. 
  In converting into joint-stock companies enterprises 
indicated in Sections 2.2 and 2.3 of the Program the Russian 
Federation Government or the Russian Goskomimushchestvo in the 
light of proposals from ministries and departments can adopt a 
decision on the issue of a "golden share" for a period of up to 
three years during the share flotation. 
  The simultaneous retention in state ownership of a "golden 
share" and other blocks of shares is not permitted. 
  If a "golden share" is issued concessions are granted to the 
labor collective according to the procedure laid down by the 
Program. 
  The Russian Federation Government and the Russian 
Goskomimushchestvo are entitled to adopt a decision to replace 
blocks of shares retained in federal ownership by a "golden 
share." 
  Dividends on shares retained in federal, state ownership are 
channeled entirely into funding social, cultural, and everyday 
facilities transferred as part of the process of converting the 
enterprise into a joint-stock company to the books sheet of 
local organs of power and remaining on the enterprise's books 
and used for the original purpose, or, if there are no such 
facilities, are channeled into the federal budget under the 
procedure envisaged by a statute elaborated by the Russian 
Ministry of Finance in coordination with the Russian 
Goskomimushchestvo. 
  This procedure for the allocation of dividends may be 
changed 
only by decision of the Russian Federation Government. 
  The inclusion of state enterprises in the groups to which 
restrictions apply according to Sections 2.1 and 2.2 of the 
Program, the adoption of decisions to retain blocks of shares in 
state ownership or issue a "golden share," and also the 
representation by officials of organs of state administration of 
the state's interests on the boards of directors of joint-stock 
companies are carried out in accordance with the statute 
elaborated by the Russian Goskomimushchestvo and approved by the 
Russian Federation Government. 
  The fact that an enterprise has a defense order not 
exceeding 
30 percent of the total volume of output sold by the enterprise, 
and also duties regarding mobilization preparation, the 
protection of state secrets, and the ensuring of safe working is 
no grounds for the retention of any blocks of shares in federal 
ownership when it is converted into a joint-stock company. 
  Shares in privatized enterprises not retained in federal 
ownership under Section 2.3 of the Program must be sold no later 
than four months from the time of registration of the 
joint-stock company and cannot be reserved in any way. 
<H3>  2.4. Facilities and Enterprises in State (Municipal) 
Ownership Which Are Privatized in Accordance With the Present 
Program by Decision of the Organs of State Power and 
Administration of Republics Within the Russian Federation, 
Krays, Oblasts, the Autonomous Oblast, Autonomous Okrugs, and 
the Cities of Moscow and St. Petersburg and With Local 
Privatization Programs </H3>
  2.4.1. Urban and suburban passenger transportation 
facilities 
and enterprises -- except motor taxi facilities and enterprises 
-- and also enterprises for their maintenance. 
  2.4.2. Bathhouses, laundries, service facilities, and social 
and cultural (health care, education, culture, and sport) 
enterprises and institutions. 
  2.4.3. Facilities and enterprises providing ritual services. 
  2.4.4. Garbage processing plants. 
  2.4.5. Pharmacies (with mandatory state licensing of their 
activities). 
  2.4.6. Facilities and enterprises in culture (including 
cinematography), physical culture, and sport in state 
(municipal) ownership. 
  2.4.7. Property which is on the books of local organs of 
power and administration and which ensures their activity. 
  2.4.8. The utilities infrastructure facilities of cities and 
rayons (including power, heat, and gas supplies, water and 
sewage pipelines, and city streetlighting), and also enterprises 
operating, servicing, and maintaining the aforementioned 
facilities. 
  2.4.9. Enterprises manufacturing prosthetic products and 
performing prosthetic work (services) (including false teeth, 
the production of prostheses, and orthopedics, except as 
indicated in Point 2.1 of the Program). 
  2.4.10. Organizations belonging to the system for the 
population's social protection in state (municipal) ownership. 
  2.4.11. Children's dachas and camps, including those on the 
books sheet of privatized enterprises. 
  2.4.12. Regional and local airports. 
  2.4.13. Enterprises belonging to regional social support 
funds, including sanatorium and resort facilities within their 
charge. 
  2.4.14. Wholesale trade enterprises serving remote Arctic 
regions of the Extreme North, regions of the Extreme North, and 
regions with equivalent status with limited shipping seasons, 
including duty-tour settlements, the settlements of geophysical 
and geological parties, and the areas of habitation and economic 
activity of small Northern peoples. 
  2.4.15. Small-scale power industry enterprises using energy 
from small rivers, solar energy, wind energy, and geothermal 
energy and enterprises operating autonomously and not connected 
to the unified power system, with the exception of nuclear 
stations. 
  2.4.16. Regional and local seaports. 
  2.4.17. General-use motor highways and enterprises and 
organizations maintaining them (except as indicated in Section 
2.1). 
  The restrictions on privatization laid down by the Program 
are mandatory for all organs of state power and administration 
and organs of local self-government. The aforementioned organs 
are forbidden to introduce additional restrictions on the 
privatization of enterprises or state and municipal property and 
the sale of shares in state and municipal ownership. 
  The privatization of facilities and enterprises to which the 
restrictions laid down by the Program apply is not permitted 
without the permission of the relevant organs. 
  The buying and selling, transfer, and exchange of stakes 
(holdings or portions of those holdings, shares) between 
corporate entities 25 percent or more of whose authorized 
capital (funds) is in state or municipal ownership. 
<H3>  2.5. Facilities and Enterprises Subject to Mandatory 
Privatizations </H3>
  The following facilities and enterprises are subject to 
mandatory privatization: 
  2.5.1. Facilities and enterprises in wholesale and retail 
trade (including the sale of output for production and 
industrial purposes), public catering and everyday services, 
including departmental facilities in the open retail trade 
network, public catering, and everyday services (except as 
indicated in Sections 2.1-2.4 of the Program). 
  2.5.2. Facilities and enterprises (organizations) in 
construction and the construction materials industry (except as 
indicated in Sections 2.2 and 2.3 of the Program). 
  2.5.3. Food and light industry enterprises. 
  2.5.4. Mothballed facilities and uncompleted facilities 
whose 
normative construction times have expired (with the exception of 
nuclear station reactor units). 
  2.5.5. The property of enterprises eliminated without legal 
succession. 
  2.5.6. Motor transport enterprises, including motor taxi 
transport (except as indicated in Section 2.4 of the Program). 
  2.5.7. Enterprises subject to mandatory flotation defined by 
the Russian Federation president's Edict No. 721 of 1 July 1992. 
  2.5.8. Trade, public catering, and everyday service 
facilities and construction industry enterprises constructed 
with funds from the state and local budgets. 
  2.5.9. Debtor-enterprises in all sectors of the national 
economy (except as indicated in Section 2.1 of the Program). 
  2.5.10. Hotel complexes, hotels, motels, campgrounds, and 
boarding houses (except as indicated in Section 2.2 of the 
Program and those forming part of an enterprise's property). 
  2.5.11. Housing and municipal service enterprises (except as 
indicated in Section 2.4 of the Program). 
<H3>  2.6. Privatization of Leased Facilities That Are Not Part of 
the Housing Stock </H3>
  Citizens engaged in entrepreneurial activity, enterprises in 
whose authorized capital the stake (holding) in state 
(municipal) ownership is no more than 25 percent, if their lease 
contract was concluded on a competitive or auction basis, and 
also partnerships and joint-stock companies created in the 
process of privatization have the right to acquire ownership of 
the nonresidential premises in apartment blocks which they 
lease, including built-in and built-on premises, and also 
buildings and installations in Russian Federation ownership and 
in the state ownership of republics within the Russian 
Federation, krays, oblasts, autonomous formations, and the 
cities of Moscow and St. Petersburg, and also in municipal 
ownership. 
  The sale of leased facilities that are not part of the 
housing stock is carried out by the relevant property management 
committee on the basis of an application by the leaseholder. 
Restrictions may not be imposed on the resale of purchased 
facilities that are not part of the housing stock. 
  A refusal to sell to the leaseholders the leased immovable 
property (buildings, installations, the parcels of land on which 
they are located), and also nonresidential premises in apartment 
blocks, including built-in and built-on premises, indicated in 
Point 2.6 of the Program is permitted only if the restrictions 
laid down by Section 2.1 of the Program apply to these 
facilities, and [is]) also [permitted] in relation to buildings 
and installations that are immovable objects of historical and 
cultural significance, religious buildings, and buildings and 
installations occupied by organs of state power and 
administration, and also by courts. 
  The price at which leaseholders acquire ownership of 
buildings, installations, and the parcels of land on which they 
are located, which constitute immovable property, and also 
nonresidential premises in apartment blocks, including built-in 
and built-on premises, is established according to the procedure 
defined by Article 17 of the Russian Federation Law "On the 
Privatization of State and Municipal Enterprises in the Russian 
Federation." Auction and competitive sale is permitted only 
regarding unoccupied or unused facilities that are not part of 
the housing stock. 
  The proceeds from the sale of leased facilities that are not 
part of the housing stock are allocated in accordance with the 
norms envisaged by the Program. 
<H3>  3. Calculated Privatization Indicators for Organs of State 
Power and Administration </H3>
  3.1. In the light of the aims of privatization and also of 
the structure and scale of privatization demand at the 
territorial and sector levels, the Russian Goskomimushchestvo 
sets for republics within the Russian Federation, krays, 
oblasts, the autonomous oblast, autonomous okrugs, and the 
cities of Moscow and St. Petersburg calculated targets for the 
flotation and privatization of enterprises in the form of a 
cumulative total and for the realization of privatization 
checks, these targets forming an integral part of the Program. 
  The calculated indicators are conveyed to the regions within 
one month of the adoption of the Program and may be clarified 
quarterly by the Russian Goskomimushchestvo. 
  3.2. On the basis of the targets the property management 
committees of republics within the Russian Federation, krays, 
oblasts, the autonomous oblast, autonomous okrugs, and the 
cities of Moscow and St. Petersburg elaborate local 
privatization programs and forecast receipts of privatization 
checks and money as a result of privatization. The local 
privatization programs approved by the relevant organs of power 
are submitted to the Russian Goskomimushchestvo and the Russian 
Federal Property Fund. 
<H3>  4. The Formation and Distribution of the Proceeds of 
Privatization </H3>
  4.1. By the funds received as a result of privatization is 
meant the entire proceeds in money and privatization checks from 
the sale of privatized facilities and the revenue received in 
the privatization process in the form of registration fees, 
guarantees, and other revenue. 
  The dividends from shares belonging to the state and rent 
payments for the leasing of state and municipal property are not 
included in the funds from privatization and are paid into the 
corresponding budget minus bank charges (except for instances 
indicated in Sections 2.3 and 6 of the Program). 
  4.2. The total revenue from privatization in 1994 is 
estimated at R0.7 trillion in privatization checks and R0.8 
trillion in cash. 
  The dividends on shares retained in federal and state 
ownership in 1994 are estimated at R200 billion. 
  4.3. The funds from privatization, including privatization 
checks, are distributed according to normatives in conformity 
with Appendix No. 1 to the Program in the following order: With 
labor collectives, money settlements are made with privatization 
organs and local budgets and payments are made into the Federal 
Enterprise Support Fund; privatization checks count toward the 
funds paid into the Russian Federation republic budget and the 
corresponding budgets of republics within the Russian 
Federation, krays, oblasts, the autonomous oblast, autonomous 
okrugs, and the cities of Moscow and St. Petersburg. 
  If blocks of shares are retained in state ownership, the 
remainder [of the shares] is treated as 100 percent during the 
distribution of the funds received from privatization. 
  4.4. The Russian Federation Government is entitled to adjust 
the indicators and normatives for the distribution of the funds 
received from privatization in the light of the state of the 
Russian Federation's financial system, conditions in the 
property market, and proposals from the relevant privatization 
organs. 
  4.5. The funds received from privatization are not liable to 
taxation. 
  4.6. The activities of property management committees and 
property funds at all levels are not taxed, including deals for 
other sales of state and municipal property. 
  4.7. The funds received from privatization are paid into 
budgets at the corresponding levels according to the established 
normatives and are channeled exclusively: 
  --into maintaining social, cultural, and everyday 
facilities, 
including those that do not form part of the property of a 
joint-stock company and those that are transferred into the 
charge of local organs of power during the privatization process; 
  --into financing measures for the post-privatization support 
of enterprises. 
  4.8. In cities under rayon jurisdiction and in cities with 
administrative-territorial divisions (rayons, settlements), the 
funds from privatization channeled into local budgets can, at 
the petition of the heads of administration of cities and urban 
rayons (settlements) and by decision of the heads of 
administration of cities and rayons during the sale of municipal 
property or [by decision] of the organs of state power of 
Russian Federation components during the sale of state property, 
be channeled by the sellers into the budgets of these 
administrative-territorial formations in order to fund the 
maintenance of social, cultural, and everyday facilities 
transferred to municipal ownership during the privatization of 
enterprises. 
  4.9. The Russian Ministry of Finance Control and Auditing 
Administration together with the Russian Goskomimushchestvo 
monitors the timeliness and correctness of privatization organs' 
payments to budgets at various levels. 
<H3>  5. Methods of Privatization and Concessions Granted During 
Privatization </H3>
  The specific method of privatizing an enterprise is 
determined by the privatization working commission or the 
privatization commission of the relevant property management 
committee in accordance with the Russian Federation Law "On the 
Privatization of State and Municipal Enterprises in the Russian 
Federation," the Russian Federation president's Edict No. 721 of 
1 July 1992 "On Organizational Measures To Convert State 
Enterprises and Voluntary Associations of State Enterprises Into 
Joint-Stock Companies," the state and local privatization 
programs, and normative acts not contravening the present 
Program. 
  It is laid down that amendments and additions to Section 2 
of 
the privatization plan can be made by the Russian 
Goskomimushchestvo, with mandatory notification of the relevant 
financial organs and enterprises undergoing privatization. It is 
not permitted to make amendments and additions to the 
privatization plan after publication of the announcement of the 
sale of a privatized facility. 
  5.1. All state (municipal) enterprises are divided into two 
groups in relation to the privatization methods they employ: 
  --the first group includes small enterprises with fixed 
capital of a book value as of 1 January 1992 of no more than R1 
million which are subject to sale by auction, competitive 
tender, and investment competition. The labor collectives of 
these enterprises are entitled, by a qualified majority of 
two-thirds of the votes of all members (at a general meeting or 
else confirmed by sheets of signatures), to choose the method of 
sale: at auction or by investment competitions without 
restriction on the participants. This decision is binding on the 
relevant property management committees; 
  --the second group includes all other enterprises, which may 
be privatized by any method envisaged in Point 5.2 of the 
Program. 
  In the event of a failure to fulfill the requirements of the 
present Program, the Russian Federation president's Edicts No. 
721 of 1 July 1992 and No. 1228 of 14 October 1992 "On the Sale 
for Privatization Checks of Housing Stock, Parcels of Land, and 
Municipal Property," or Decree No. 757 of the Russian Federation 
Council of Ministers-Government dated 10 August 1993 "On the 
Implementation of Additional Measures To Protect the Right of 
Russian Citizens To Take Part in Privatization," property 
management committees (ministries and departments) are entitled 
under the established procedure to decide to dissolve contracts 
concluded earlier with enterprise leaders or, in the absence of 
contracts, to dismiss them from their posts. In this case the 
conversion of enterprises into joint-stock companies takes place 
on the initiative of the relevant property management committee 
under the established procedure, with members of their labor 
collectives being granted concessions only under the first 
option (Point 5.3.1) in the Program. 
  5.2. Under the procedure established by the Program the use 
of the following privatization methods is envisaged: 
  --the sale of shares in open-type joint-stock companies 
created during the privatization process; 
  --the sale of enterprises that are not joint-stock companies 
at auctions; 
  --the sale of enterprises that are not joint-stock companies 
by commercial tender (including tenders with restrictions on 
participants); 
  --the sale of blocks of shares in joint-stock companies by 
investment competition; 
  --the sale of the property (assets) of functioning 
enterprises, enterprises in the process of being liquidated, and 
liquidated enterprises, and also of facilities whose 
construction is unfinished, at auctions and by tender; 
  --the purchase of leased property; the sale of enterprises 
to 
partnerships created in accordance with the additional 
concessions envisaged by Point 5.16; 
  --the sale of stakes (holdings, shares) in state or 
municipal 
ownership by auction and commercial tender, including tenders 
with restrictions on the participants. 
<H3>  5.3. The Sale of Shares in an Open-Type Joint-Stock Company 
Created in the Process of Privatizations </H3>
<H3>  A. Concessions to Members of the Labor Collective in 
Converting a State (Municipal) Enterprise Into an Open-Type 
Joint-Stock Company </H3>

  5.3.1. During the sale (free transfer) of shares in 
open-type 
joint-stock companies created via the conversion of state and 
municipal enterprises (including those previously converted into 
closed-type joint-stock companies), the enterprise labor 
collective decides to apply one of the options for granting 
concessions to the labor collective of a privatized enterprise 
envisaged by the Program, and these concessions also extend to: 
  --workers for whom the enterprise in question is their main 
workplace; former workers who have at least 10 years' record 
of work at the privatized enterprise for men and at least 7 
years six months' for women and who left at their own request 
(including by virtue of transfer to other work), as a result of 
downsizing or staff reductions, and also during the 
reorganization of enterprises; 
  --persons having the right under Russian Federation 
legislation to return to their former job at the enterprise, 
including persons drafted into military service while working at 
a state (municipal) enterprise before its conversion into a 
joint-stock company, provided that they return to their former 
job within three months of demobilization; 
  --pensioners who made their pension arrangements and retired 
at the enterprise in question; 
  --persons dismissed from the enterprise as a result of 
downsizing or staff reductions after 1 January 1992 and 
registered as unemployed; 
  -workers of these enterprises who retired on an invalidity 
pension as a result of on-the-job injury or occupational disease; 
  --family members who are the heirs of workers at the 
enterprise who died at the given production facility. 
  All persons to whom the concessions in question apply are 
included in the number of personnel on equal terms with the 
workers for whom the enterprise is the main workplace. 
<H6>  Option 1 </H6>
  All members of the labor collective of the privatized 
enterprise and persons of equivalent status and the right to 
concessions: 
  --receive a one-time free transfer of personalized 
privileged 
(nonvoting) shares making up 25 percent of the authorized 
capital but totaling no more than 20 times the legally 
established minimum wage per worker; 
  ordinary shares making up to 10 percent of the authorized 
capital but totaling no more than six times the legally 
established minimum wage per worker are sold by restricted 
subscription to members of the labor collective at 30 percent 
below face value with payment by installments over up to three 
months; the size of the initial installment cannot be less than 
50 percent of the face value of the shares. 
  The administration of the privatized enterprise -- the 
leader, his deputy, the chief engineer, the chief accountant, 
the leader of a separate subsidiary structural component or 
subsidiary -- on the basis of the terms of the contracts 
concluded with them is granted the right to purchase at face 
value ordinary shares worth a total of up to 5 percent of the 
authorized capital, but no more than 2,000-times the minimum 
wage established by Russian Federation legislation per person. 
  At enterprises with an average staff of over 10,000 people 
and with separate subsidiary structural components, shops, and 
sections, and also in cases where a privatization plan envisages 
the restructuring of an enterprise and the formation of 
subsidiary enterprises, the list of administration officials 
with the right to this concession may be extended by decision of 
the labor collective. 
<H6>  Option 2 </H6>
  All members of the labor collective of the enterprise being 
privatized and persons of equal status who are entitled to 
concessions are given the right to acquire ordinary (voting) 
shares representing up to 51 percent of the authorized capital. 
  In this event: 
  --there is no free transfer or sale of shares on 
concessionary terms; 
  --the selling price of shares is determined according to the 
Statute on Restricted Subscriptions ratified by the Russian 
Goskomimushchestvo. 
<H6>  Option 3 </H6>
  If a group of enterprise workers or any individual or 
corporate entity, recognized as purchasers under Article 9 of 
the Russian Federation Law "On the Privatization of State and 
Municipal Enterprises in the Russian Federation," undertakes 
responsibility for fulfilling the enterprise's privatization 
plans and preventing its bankruptcy and acquires the consent of 
the labor collective's general meeting to conclude the 
appropriate contract whose term cannot exceed one year (without 
the right to extend it), the members of this group are given the 
right to acquire 30 percent of the authorized capital in the 
form of ordinary shares in the enterprises at nominal value when 
the aforementioned term has expired and the conditions of the 
aforementioned contract have been fulfilled. 
  The procedure for concluding the shares acquisition contract 
with the group of workers is prescribed by the statute approved 
by the Russian Goskomimushchestvo. 
  While the contract is in force, the aforementioned group is 
given the right to vote on behalf of all shares held by the 
relevant property fund. 
  The privatization plan incorporates the conditions of the 
contract, whose conclusion with the aforementioned group of 
joint-stock company founders is mandatory. The contract defines 
the group members' obligations and the limit of their material 
liability guaranteed by privately-owned property (pledged by way 
of a mortgage) amounting to at least 200 times the minimum wage 
prescribed by Russian Federation legislation at the time the 
mortgage is pledged per group member. 
  Under this option, ordinary shares are sold to all 
enterprise 
workers (including the group members) to a total value of 20 
percent of the authorized capital but not in excess of 20 times 
the minimum wage prescribed by Russian Federation legislation 
per worker, with a 30-percent discount on the face value and a 
three-month deferment of payment. Furthermore, the amount of the 
first instalment cannot be less than 25 percent of the share's 
face value. 
  In the event of the group failing to fulfill the contract 
conditions, the shares due to be sold to this group's members 
are sold to the population at check auctions (at money auctions 
after 1 July 1994). 
  The procedure for the allocation of shares to be transferred 
without payment (when Option 1 is chosen) is determined by a 
general meeting (conference) of the labor collective by a simple 
majority of votes. 
  The sale of shares to labor collective members and persons 
of 
equal status within the limits of the concessions prescribed by 
this Program is effected by way of restricted subscription in 
accordance with the statute approved by the Russian 
Goskomimushchestvo. 
  Property management committees are permitted to extend to 
three months the deadline for holding restricted subscriptions 
for shares among enterprise workers on the basis of specific 
enterprises' specific production activity. The sale of shares 
transferred to property funds can be effected prior to the 
conclusion of the restricted subscription. 
  The decision on the choice of option of concessions 
prescribed by the Program is adopted by a general meeting of the 
labor collective or is certified by a list of its members' 
signatures. The decision is deemed adopted if at least 
two-thirds of the total number of enterprise workers have voted 
(signed) in favor of it. In the absence of such a decision, 
concessions are granted according to Option 1. 
  The workers of enterprises belonging to the same 
technological complex as the enterprise being privatized, 
regardless of the concessions option which has been chosen by 
decision of the labor collective, are given the right to 
participate in the restricted subscription to shares held among 
workers of the enterprise being privatized on the same 
conditions. 
  5.3.2. Any shares acquired or received free by citizens or 
corporate entities can be sold by the owner without any 
restrictions. The imposition of restrictions is prohibited. 
  5.3.3. The determination of the initial price of state 
(municipal) enterprises when being sold at auction or via 
commercial (noncommercial) or investment tender is effected 
according to the procedure prescribed by the Interim 
Methodological Recommendations for Estimating the Value of 
Facilities Being Privatized, ratified by Edict No. 66 of the 
Russian Federation president of 29 January 1992 "On Accelerating 
the Privatization of State and Municipal Enterprises," with due 
consideration for the amendments introduced by Directive No. 763 
of the Russian Goskomimushchestvo of 13 November 1993 "On Some 
Questions Concerning the Application of the Interim 
Methodological Recommendations for Estimating the Value of 
Facilities Being Privatized." 
  The valuation of property is effected on the basis of 
balance 
sheet figures for the accounting quarter preceding the 
computation of the valuation. The value of fixed assets 
represented by incomplete construction work and uninstalled 
equipment is determined in the valuation document without taking 
into account the results of the revaluation of fixed assets 
conducted in accordance with Decree No. 595 of the Russian 
Federation Government of 14 August 1992 "On the Revaluation of 
Fixed Assets (Capital) in the Russian Federation" or any 
subsequent revaluation of fixed assets. 
  The actual profit earned by enterprises in 1993-1994 is not 
a 
source for forming the enterprise workers' privatization fund 
and is not excluded from the value of property when determining 
the enterprise's initial price. 
  5.3.4. When state (municipal) enterprises are being 
converted 
into open-type joint-stock companies, the amount of authorized 
capital is determined on the basis of balance sheet figures as 
at 1 July 1992 without taking into account the results of the 
revaluation of fixed assets conducted in accordance with Decree 
No. 595 of the Russian Federation Government of 14 August 1992 
"On the Revaluation of Fixed Assets (Capital) in the Russian 
Federation" or any subsequent revaluation of fixed assets, or 
any foreign currency items appearing on the balance sheet. 
  In this event the following are applied in order to 
determine 
the option of concessions offered to labor collective members: 
  --the minimum wage as at 1 July 1992 (900 rubles [R]); 
  --the average numerical strength of the enterprise's work 
force according to figures reported for the first six months of 
1992. 
  All changes in the composition and value of property since 1 
July 1992 are treated as changes to the composition and value of 
property owned by the joint-stock company. 
  The actual profit earned by enterprises in 1993-1994 is not 
a 
source for forming the enterprise workers' privatization fund 
and is not excluded from the value of property when determining 
the amount of authorized capital. 
  5.3.5. The amount of authorized capital of joint-stock 
companies created via the conversion of state (municipal) 
enterprises founded (registered) since 1 July 1992 is determined 
on the basis of balance sheet figures for the accounting quarter 
preceding the valuation. 
  When determining the amount of authorized capital, the value 
of fixed assets represented by incomplete construction work and 
uninstalled equipment is determined in the valuation document 
without taking into account the results of the revaluation of 
fixed assets conducted in accordance with Decree No. 595 of the 
Russian Federation Government of 14 August 1992 "On the 
Revaluation of Fixed Assets (Capital) in the Russian Federation" 
or any subsequent revaluation of fixed assets. 
  In this event the following are applied to determine the 
option of concessions offered to labor collective members: 
  --the minimum wage in effect at the time when the state 
(municipal) enterprise was registered (founded); 
  --the average numerical strength of the enterprise's work 
force according to figures reported for the six months preceding 
the valuation. 
  5.3.6. With a view to safeguarding the interests of 
stockholders, any increase in the joint-stock company's 
authorized capital is prohibited until 90 percent of the stock 
of the enterprise being privatized is sold. 
<H3>  B. Concessions to Members of the Labor Collective and the 
Administration of an Enterprise Being Privatized Offered 
Following the Completion of the Sale of Shares for Privatization 
Checks </H3>
  5.3.7. The following rights are granted in the event that 
more than 80 percent of the joint-stock company's shares are 
sold and the volume of shares set by legislation for sale 
against privatization checks is also sold: 
  --members of the labor collective of the enterprise being 
privatized can begin purchasing (partially acquiring without 
payment) shares from the enterprise workers' flotation fund, 
provided that this fund was incorporated in a privatization plan 
ratified prior to the Program's promulgation; 
  --the joint-stock company can, as part of the privatization 
process, buy the plot of land on which the enterprise being 
privatized stands in accordance with current legislation. In 
this process, the vendors of such land plots are the relevant 
property funds. The distribution of funds acquired as a result 
of the sale of land plots is effected according to normatives 
contained in Appendix No. 1 to this program. 


Appendix No. 1 to the Program: Normatives for the Distribution of Funds Earned as a 
Result of Privatization* 

Category of fund recipients   Normatives for   Normatives for   Normatives for the 
                              the              the              distribution of 
                              distribution     distribution     funds earned as a 
                              of funds         of funds         result of the sale 
                              earned as a      earned as a      of property (except 
                              result of        result of        property owned by 
                              privatization    privatization    enterprises) 
                              following        following        administered by the 
                              settlement       settlement       Russian Federation 
                              with labor       with labor       Armed Forces, the 
                              collective       collective       Russian Federation 
                              members for      members for      Federal 
                              facilities in    facilities in    Counterintelligence 
                              municipal        federal          Service, and the 
                              ownership (in    ownership or     Russian Federation 
                              percentages)     owned by         Ministry of Internal 
                                               republics        Affairs (in 
                                               within the       percentages) 
                                               Russian 
                                               Federation, 
                                               the autonomous 
                                               oblast, 
                                               autonomous 
                                               okrugs, krays, 
                                               oblasts, or 
                                               the cities of 
                                               Moscow and St. 
                                               Petersburg (in 
                                               percentages) 

Local budgets                 45               10               - 

Budgets of republics within   25               45               - 
the Russian Federation, 
krays, oblasts, the 
autonomous oblast, and 
autonomous okrugs 

Federal budget                20               30               100** 

Federal Enterprise Support    -                5                - 
Fund 

Russian Goskomimushchestvo    1.7***           1.7***           - 

Property managemment          4.5              4.5              - 
committees, territorial 
agencies of Russian 
Goskomimushchestvo 

Russian Federal Property      0.3              0.3              - 
Fund 

Property funds of             3.5              3.5              - 
national-state, 
national-territorial, and 
administrative-territorial 
formations 

*The normatives for the distribution of funds earned as a result of privatization to 
the accounts of relevant property funds and committees for the management of 
property come into force 1 January 1994. 

**Funds are distributed in accordance with the statutes elaborated by the relevant 
ministries, with 1 percent of the aforementioned funds being used to encourage the 
activity of privatization process organizers. 

***At least 50 percent of the funds earned as a result of privatization and received 
by the Russian Goskomimushchestvo are channeled into the holding of check auctions. 
If the holding of check auctions and check investment tenders results in a shortage 
of the cash available for transfer to the privatization organs under the normatives 
prescribed by this table, the shortage in question is made up from local budget 
funds. 

The management of these funds is effected by a joint group comprising 
representatives of the Russian Goskomimushchestvo and the Russian Federal Property 
Fund. 


<H3>  C. Concessions for Members of the Labor Collective and the 
Administration in the Event of a Controlling Interest Remaining 
in State (Municipal) Ownership </H3>
  5.3.8. In the event of a controlling interest remaining in 
state (municipal) ownership, concessions to enterprise workers 
are offered as follows: 
  --if the controlling interest totals 51 percent of the total 
stock, all members of the labor collective and persons with 
equal status receive as a one-shot transfer and without payment 
personally-registered privileged stock comprising 25 percent of 
the authorized capital but not more than 20 times the minimum 
wage set by Russian Federation legislation per worker. No other 
concessions are offered; 
  --if the controlling interest totals 38 percent of the total 
stock, then concessions to labor collective members and persons 
of equal status are offered in accordance with Option 1 of 
concessions (Point 5.3.1. of the Program). 
  No enterprise workers' flotation fund is formed in either 
case, and all remaining unallocated shares are subject to sale 
at specialized check auctions (money auctions after 1 July 1994). 
  If 25.5 percent of the shares remain in state ownership, 
concessions to labor collective members and persons of equal 
status are offered in accordance with Option 1 of concessions, 
and all remaining stock is subject to sale at specialized check 
auctions. 
<H3>  D. Acquisition (Sale) of Stock from Enterprise Workers' 
Flotation Fund </H3>
  5.3.9. No provision is made for the creation of an 
Enterprise 
Workers' Flotation Fund (hereinafter referred to as FARP) at 
enterprises which have filed a privatization application since 1 
February 1994. 
  The acquisition (sale) of stock from the FARP is effected 
according to the procedure prescribed by the Russian Federation 
Government and this Program. When state and municipal 
enterprises are converted into open-type joint-stock companies, 
a FARP can be formed following a proposal by the labor 
collective by using a contribution from the relevant property 
fund, provided its total value does not exceed 10 percent of the 
enterprise's authorized capital if Option 1 or Option 3 of 
concessions has been chosen, or 5 percent thereof if Option 2 of 
concessions for labor collective members has been chosen. 
  The transfer of shares from the FARP is effected when 80 
percent of the shares have been sold and following completion of 
the sale of the amount of shares prescribed by legislation for 
sale against privatization checks. Furthermore, a proportion of 
the total amount of FARP shares, comprising one-tenth of the 
total amount of shares in the relevant joint-stock company sold 
against privatization checks (excluding shares sold or 
transferred to the labor collective on concessionary terms), is 
to be transferred without payment to labor collective members. 
  The FARP is formed for a term of not more than two years 
from 
the time the joint-stock company is registered. The right to 
acquire shares from the FARP is vested in labor collective 
members whose main job is with the relevant joint-stock company. 
  5.4. Sale of Joint-Stock Companies' Shares at Specialized 
Check Auctions 
  5.4.1. The main form of share sale through 1 July 1994 is 
the 
sale of shares at specialized check auctions, whose procedure is 
determined by the Russian Goskomimushchestvo, as well as at 
interregional specialized check auctions and interregional 
all-Russia specialized check auctions held in accordance with 
Decree No. 786 of the Russian Federation Council of 
Ministers-Government of 10 August 1993 "On the Sale of Shares at 
Interregional Specialized Check Auctions." 
  The conditions for holding interregional and interregional 
all-Russia specialized check auctions are regulated by the 
Russian Goskomimushchestvo. All holders of privatization 
checks recognized as purchasers in accordance with Russian 
Federation legislation are permitted to participate in 
specialized check auctions. 
  5.4.2. A specialized check auction is a means for selling 
shares by bids, whereby: 
  --all winning bids acquire shares at a uniform price; 
participation in the auction is gained by submitting one of two 
types of application, indicating either only the amount of 
privatization checks (Category 1 application), or the amount of 
privatization checks for shares indicating a minimum number of 
nominal value shares per privatization check (Category 2 
application); 
  --persons submitting Category 1 applications are always 
among 
the bid winners. 
  The sale of shares at specialized check auctions is effected 
by the relevant property fund, property management committee or 
its representative, or the enterprise being privatized, in 
accordance with Edict No. 1229 of the Russian Federation 
president of 14 October 1992 "On Developing the Privatization 
Check System in the Russian Federation." 
  The application of different procedures for holding 
specialized check auctions, except as prescribed by directive 
No. 701 of the Russian Goskomimushchestvo of 4 November 1992, is 
prohibited. 
  The sale of shares in enterprises being privatized at 
specialized check auctions is effected in accordance with 
privatization plans endorsed by property management committees 
and with schedules for the holding of specialized check auctions 
which are mandatory for property funds. Furthermore, the sale 
of shares at specialized check auctions is permitted before the 
completion of the restricted subscription for shares among labor 
collective members. 
  5.4.3. An interregional specialized check auction is an 
auction held according to the procedure prescribed by the 
Statute for Specialized Check Auctions ratified by Directive No. 
701 of the Russian Goskomimushchestvo of 4 November 1992. The 
collection of applications for participation in interregional 
specialized check auctions must be organized simultaneously on 
the territory of at least five components of the Russian 
Federation. 
  5.4.4. An interregional all-Russia specialized check auction 
is an auction held according to the procedure prescribed by the 
Statute for Specialized Check Auctions ratified by Directive No. 
701 of the Russian Goskomimushchestvo of 4 November 1992, and 
the collection of applications for participation in it must be 
organized simultaneously on the territory of at least 25 
components of the Russian Federation. 
  When an interregional all-Russia specialized check auction 
is 
being held, it is mandatory to organize the collection of 
applications in the city of Moscow. 5.4.5. Property funds 
ensure the sale of at least 29 percent of the shares of a 
joint-stock company in accordance with the privatization plan 
(with the exception of joint-stock companies created on the 
basis of fuel and energy complex enterprises being privatized in 
accordance with the Russian Federation president's Edicts No. 
923 of 15 August 1992, No. 1333 and No. 1334 of 5 November 1992, 
No. 1403 of 17 November 1992, and No. 1702 of 30 December 1992) 
not later than two months following the transformation and 
exclusively at specialized check auctions. 
  The shares of joint-stock companies created in the process 
of 
privatization and held in federal ownership, the book value of 
whose fixed assets exceeds R250 million, are eligible for sale 
exclusively at interregional and interregional all-Russia 
specialized check auctions held by property funds in accordance 
with the Statute for Holding Interregional All-Russia 
Specialized Check Auctions ratified by Directive No. 1853 of the 
Russian Goskomimushchestvo of 28 October 1993 and in accordance 
with the schedule endorsed by the Russian Goskomimushchestvo. 
  5.4.6. In the event that a joint-stock company's shares are 
offered as payment for the authorized capital of another 
joint-stock company (holding company), shares in the latter to 
the equivalent nominal value must be sold at a specialized check 
auction and reflected in this joint-stock company's 
privatization plan. Furthermore, it is mandatory for sale of the 
shares to be held also in the home region of the joint-stock 
company whose shares were invested in the holding company. 
  After 1 July 1994 shares will be sold at auctions for money 
in accordance with the statute ratified by the Russian 
Goskomimushchestvo. 
<H3>  5.5. Sale of Enterprises Which Are Not Joint-Stock Companies 
at Auctions </H3>
  A sale at auction occurs when, as a result of open bidding, 
indivduals or corporate entities acquire as private property 
facilities being privatized and the purchasers are not required 
to fulfill any conditions whatsoever as regards the facility 
being privatized. 
  The right of ownership is transferred to the purchaser who 
offers the highest price in the course of the bidding. 
  In this event, workers of the enterprise being privatized, 
as well as persons dismissed from this enterprise as a result of 
personnel cutbacks or downsizing since 1 January 1992 and 
registered as unemployed who have not acquired any ownership 
right as a result of the auction, will receive 30 percent of the 
money thus earned, but not more than 40 times the minimum wage 
set by Russian Federation legislation per worker. 
<H3>  5.6. Sale of Enterprises Which Are Not Joint-Stock Companies 
by Commercial Tender (Including Tender with Limited Number of 
Participants) </H3>
  5.6.1. A sale by commercial tender occurs when individuals 
or 
corporate entities acquire as private property facilities being 
privatized and the purchasers are required to fulfill some 
conditions as regards the facility being privatized. The list of 
tender conditions is determined in accordance with the Statute 
for the Privatization of State and Municipal Enterprises in the 
Russian Federation by Tender. The imposition of any conditions 
not contained in the aforementioned statute is not permitted. 
  The retention of the privatized facility's specialization 
and 
the prohibition of breaks in its work of for more than two 
months following the purchase-sale and (or) for a total of three 
months during a calendar year are mandatory conditions for the 
sale by tender of all facilities in the trade network, public 
catering, and everyday services. Any changes in the privatized 
facility's work schedule resulting in reductions are permitted 
only by agreement with the local administration. 
  In the event that workers of the enterprise being 
privatized, 
as well as persons dismissed from this enterprise as a result of 
personnel cutbacks or downsizing since 1 January 1992 and 
registered as unemployed, have not acquired any ownership right 
as a result of the tender, they will receive compensation 
equivalent to 20 percent of the money thus earned, but not more 
than 30 times the minimum wage set by Russian Federation 
legislation per worker. 
  5.6.2. Commercial tenders take the form of open auction bids 
or closed tenders. The acquisition right goes to the purchaser 
who has offered the highest price. 
  Sale by commercial tender with limited participation is 
permitted (in accordance with local privatization programs) only 
for the privatization of trade network, public catering, or 
everyday services enterprises located in rural localities, 
urban-type settlements, Far North regions, and equivalent 
localities. 
  Only workers in the enterprise being privatized and 
residents 
of the region in question are permitted to participate in such 
tenders. 
<H3>  5.7. Sale of Blocks of Shares in Joint-Stock Companies by 
Competitive Investment Tender </H3>
  Competitive investment tenders are used for the sale of 
blocks of shares in joint-stock companies belonging to the state 
when the purchasers are required to make investments. 
  The criterion used to determine the winning bid is the total 
amount of investment discounted for the entire period of the 
investment commitment by the discount rate of the Central Bank 
of the Russian Federation at the time the tender is held. 
  The following are mandatory requirements for competitive 
tendering: 
  --within one month from the conclusion of the competitive 
investment tendering, the winner must deposit in the 
enterprise's current account at least 20 percent of the total 
amount being invested (with 0.5 percent of this sum being 
remitted by the investment tender winner in equal shares to the 
accounts of the relevant property management committees and 
property fund); by decision of the Russian Federation Government 
the amount of the initial investment deposit may in individual 
cases be reduced to 10 percent; 
  --the investment deposit term is not more than three years; 
  --payment for the block of shares sold by investment tender 
is calculated at the stock's nominal value. 
  All investment tenders are open, in other words they are 
open to competition by all interested individuals and corporate 
entities. 
  Investment tenders are held in accordance with the statute 
ratified by the Russian Goskomimushchestvo. 
  A debt which an enterprise whose stock is being sold by 
investment tender owes to a bid-winning creditor is reduced by 
an amount equivalent to the latter's investment. 
  5.8. When state and municipal enterprises (and the property 
of enterprises in the process of liquidation) are sold by tender 
or at auction, a partnership (joint-stock company) comprising at 
least one-third of the total work force of the enterprise 
(subsidiary component) being privatized is offered a 30-percent 
discount on the sale price and a deferment of payment for up to 
three months. The amount of the initial deposit set by the 
privatization plan or, where the requisite written record is 
lacking, by the vendor, cannot be less than 25 percent of the 
sale price and can be paid by the purchaser in the following 
form: up to 80 percent in privatization checks and the remainder 
in cash. 
  5.9 Individuals and corporate entities who have become 
owners 
of privatized state and municipal enterprises at an auction 
(tender) are given the right to conclude long-term (for a term 
of at least 15 years) contracts to lease any state (municipal) 
nonresidential premises, buildings, or structures occupied by 
these enterprises and not included in the inventory of property 
acquired by the purchasers, as well as to acquire ownership 
rights to the aforementioned nonresidential premises, buildings, 
or structures immediately after the contract for the 
purchase-sale of the enterprise has come into force. In this 
event, the relevant committee for the management of property is 
the vendor. Such a buy-out is effected at a price to be 
determined according to the methodology to be ratified by the 
Russian Goskomimushchestvo. 
  The owners of privatized state (municipal) enterprises have 
the exclusive right to acquire property rights to the land plots 
occupied by these enterprises. 
  Any change in the terms of the contract for leasing the 
aforementioned premises, buildings, and structures from a 
previously concluded contract is permitted only subject to the 
parties' agreement, unless otherwise provided by the contract's 
terms. 
  5.10. In cases when, in the process of holding an auction 
(tender) for the sale of enterprises being privatized, an 
individual or corporate entity recognized as a purchaser in 
accordance with Article 9 of the Russian Federation Law "On the 
Privatization of State and Municipal Enterprises in the Russian 
Federation" is the sole participant in the auction (tender), any 
enterprise located in a rural locality or a workers' settlement 
will be sold to the aforementioned person at 10 times the 
property's value as determined in accordance with the valuation 
document, and at 100 times that value if the enterprise is 
located in an urban area. 
  In the event envisaged in Point 5.8. of this Program, the 
enterprise workers or the partnership (joint-stock company) who 
have purchased the enterprise will be offered no concessions. 
  5.11. When an enterprise is sold by tender or at auction in 
the process of privatization, the amount of deposit (earnest 
money) required to be paid by participants in the tender or 
auction is set at 100 percent of the facility's starting price, 
but not more than 1,000 times the minimum wage set by Russian 
Federation legislation. 
<H3>  5.12. Sale of Property (Assets) of Operating Enterprises, 
Enterprises in the Process of Liquidation, and Liquidated 
Enterprises, and of Incomplete Construction Projects, by Tender, 
at Auction, or by Investment Tender </H3>
  5.12.1. The sale of property (assets) of enterprises in the 
process of liquidation and liquidated enterprises is effected 
exclusively at auctions by the relevant property funds (property 
management committees) in accordance with a statute to be 
ratified by the Russian Goskomimushchestvo. 
  In this event workers of the enterprise, as well as persons 
dismissed from this enterprise as a result of personnel cutbacks 
or doznsizing since 1 January 1992 and registered as unemployed, 
will be paid a sum of up to 50 percent of the cash earned as a 
result of the sale of the property (assets) after satisfying the 
creditors' demands, but not more than 40 times the minimum 
monthly wage set by Russian Federation legislation per worker. 
  5.12.2. The sale of the property (assets) of operating state 
(municipal) enterprises is effected exclusively for cash, 
subject to permission from the relevant property management 
committee, at auction organized by the property fund according 
to procedures to be determined by the Russian Goskomimushchestvo. 
  In this event 80 percent of the funds earned as a result of 
the sale of property remain at the enterprise's disposal and 
cannot be allocated for wage payments, while 20 percent will be 
distributed in accordance with the normatives for the 
distribution of funds from privatization prescribed in Appendix 
No. 1 of this Program. 
  The results of the auction are formalized in a purchase-sale 
contract. 
  5.12.3. The privatization of the assets of incomplete 
construction projects is effected exclusively for money taking 
into account the opinion of ministries and departments: 
  --via the sale of these facilities' assets at auction or by 
tender; 
  --via the registration of an open joint-stock company with 
100-percent state capital with subsequent sale of stock. 
  The distribution of money revenue from the sale of the 
assets 
of incomplete construction projects is effected as follows: 
  --50 percent to the enterprise from whose property portfolio 
the assets of the incomplete construction projects were taken; 
  --the remaining money is distributed equally between the 
relevant property management committee and property fund and is 
channeled into financing the privatization process. 
  The decision to choose one of the aforementioned methods for 
the privatization of incomplete construction projects is adopted 
by the relevant property management committee. 
  Working commissions for the privatization of state 
(municipal) enterprises have the right to make decisions on 
excluding incomplete construction projects from the assets of an 
enterprise being privatized. The compilation of the final 
balance sheet is assigned to the relevant property management 
committee. In this event the incomplete construction projects 
will be privatized by the relevant property management committee 
fexclusively for money as facilities being state (municipal) 
property. 
<H5>  5.13. The Sale of Debtor Enterprises </H5>
  5.13.1 The sale of debtor enterprises is effected in 
accordance with an edict of the Russian Federation president. 
  5.13.2. With a view to preventing insolvency (bankruptcy) 
the 
Federal Administration for Insolvency (Bankruptcy) Affairs under 
the Russian Goskomimushchestvo ensures the examination of 
questions and the adoption of decisions on compulsory 
privatization of state enterprises which cannot pay their debts 
and have an unsatisfactory balance sheet structure (with the 
exception of enterprises whose privatization is prohibited in 
accordance with the Program). 
  A compulsory privatization decision adopted by the said 
Federal Administration and documents drawn up by it are 
mandatory for the appropriate property management committee to 
privatize the enterprise. 
  The privatization of enterprises for which privatization 
restrictions have been prescribed is effected in accordance with 
a procedure determined by Russian Federation privatization 
legislation. 
  5.13.3. The requirements of Point 5.13 [as published] apply 
to all state (municipal) enterprises where the proportion in 
state ownership exceeds 25 percent and is eligible for 
privatization. 
<H3>  5.14. The Privatization of Leased State and Municipal 
Property </H3>
  5.14.1. The purchase of leased state and municipal property 
is effected by leasing enterprises whose form of legal 
organization has been brought into line with Articles 9-12 of 
the RSFSR Law "On Enterprises and Entrepreneurial Activity." 
  5.14.2. The purchase of state and municipal property under 
leasing contracts with a right-to-buy clause which were 
concluded prior to the entry into force of the Russian 
Federation Law "On the Privatization of State and Municipal 
Enterprises in the Russian Federation" and which define the 
timing, cost, procedure, and terms for proceeding with the 
purchase is effected on the basis of a declaration by the 
leaseholder in accordance with the said contract. 
  5.14.3. The purchase of state and municipal property under 
leasing contracts with a right-to-buy clause which were 
concluded prior to the entry into force of the Russian 
Federation Law "On the Privatization of State and Municipal 
Enterprises in the Russian Federation" but which do not define 
the timing, cost, procedure, or terms for proceeding with the 
purchase is effected as follows: 
  --in instances when the value of the state (municipal) 
property indicated in the contract was no more than R1 million 
at the moment it was leased -- on the basis of an additional 
agreement concluded by the appropriate property management 
committee with the leasehold enterprises (enterprise components) 
on purchasing the leased property and determining the cost of 
the purchase, following a declaration by the leaseholder. Unless 
it is laid down in the leasing contract, the cost of the 
purchase is defined as 10 times the value of the leased 
property. Additional agreements cannot be concluded with 
leasehold enterprises providing services for citizens and other 
enterprises and organizations in the sphere of trade, public 
catering, or everyday services which included structural 
components (stores, workshops, and so forth) at the time the 
contract was concluded; 
  --in instances when the value of the state (municipal) 
property indicated in the contract totaled more than R1 million 
at the moment it was leased -- by converting the leasehold 
enterprise into an open-type joint-stock company. 
  The founders of such a company are the relevant property 
management committee and the individuals and corporate entities 
with the right to own property belonging to this enterprise who 
in this instance have a priority entitlement to purchase shares 
belonging to the state on the basis of an exclusive-access 
[zakrytyy] subscription. Each share issued through such a 
subscription is sold at a price equal to the nominal value of 
one share in the joint-stock company multiplied by two. When 
paying for the shares the participants in the subscription are 
obliged to use privatization checks to pay at least 50 percent 
of their payment by 1 July 1994 and have the right to submit 
privatization checks for up to 100 percent of their payment. 
  5.14.4. Citizens who are members of the labor collective of 
subsidiary components of enterprises which have been created by 
the labor collective of state (municipal) enterprises engaged in 
trade, public catering, and everyday services on the basis of 
the leasing of property belonging to these enterprises, have the 
right to purchase a proportion of the leased property equal to 
the proportion of total production (sale) of goods, works, and 
services attributable to the said component with a discount of 
30 percent on the value of the said property as stipulated by 
the leasing agreement, on condition that they have formed a 
partnership or joint-stock company; this does not require the 
consent of the labor collective of the entire leasehold 
enterprise. The authorized capital of such a partnership 
(joint-stock company) is formed from its share of the capital of 
the leasehold property. The said partnership is the legal 
successor of the leaseholder in respect of the property 
allocated to it in the context of its share of the final balance. 
  5.14.5. The purchase of state or municipal property under 
leasing contracts which were concluded after the entry into 
force of the Russian Federation Law "On the Privatization of 
State and Municipal Enterprises in the Russian Federation" or 
which did not include a right-to-buy clause is effected by 
converting the leasehold enterprise into an open-type 
joint-stock company (partnership) by decision of a meeting of 
the founders of the joint-stock company as defined by Point 
5.14.3 of the Program. In this case shares in state (municipal) 
ownership are sold by check auction, auction, or tender and are 
purchasable by the leaseholders on the basis applicable to 
everybody. 
  5.14.6. A partnership or joint-stock company which was 
formed 
on the basis of the leasing of state property in the said 
enterprise (subsidiary component) and which has purchased this 
property has an exclusive right to take into ownership (or to 
lease for a period of at least 15 years, depending on their 
desire) of the buildings, installations, and nonresidential 
premises which they had leased or of which they had de facto 
possession and which they utilized in the process of their 
authorized activity at a price set by the Russian 
Goskomimushchestvo. 
  5.14.7. The features governing the privatization of leased 
state and municipal property are regulated by a statute approved 
by the Russian Goskomimushchestvo. 
<H3>  5.15. Protection of the Interests of Workers in Enterprises 
Undergoing Privatization </H3>
  5.15.1. With a view to protecting the interests of workers 
in 
enterprises undergoing privatization, from the moment that a 
labor collective adopts a decision to submit an application for 
the privatization of a state (municipal) enterprise (subsidiary 
component) or from the moment that an application is submitted 
by an individual or corporate entity until the moment that the 
purchaser acquires ownership rights or until the moment that 
more than 75 percent of the shares in the enterprise undergoing 
privatization are sold, it is prohibited -- without the consent 
of the appropriate property management committee and without 
considering the view of the appropriate ministry or department 
-- to: 
  --reorganize, liquidate, or change the structure of the 
enterprise; 
  --amend or terminate previously concluded contracts for the 
leasing of nonresidential premises, buildings, and structures 
occupied by enterprises undergoing privatization and also 
contracts for the leasing of property to gold-prospecting artels; 
  --amend the enterprise table of organization, reduce the 
size 
of the work force without a decision from the labor collective 
of the enterprise (subsidiary component) or a body so empowered 
by it, or discharge or reassign enterprise (subsidiary 
component) workers and management officials who are members of 
the privatization working commissions, with the exception of 
instances when people are discharged of their own volition. 
  5.15.2. When enterprises are converted into open-type 
joint-stock companies in accordance with the Russian Federation 
president's Edict No. 721 of 1 July 1992, the date of the 
enterprise leader's order or labor collective general meeting's 
decision to form a working commission for the privatization of 
the said enterprise is deemed to be the date of adoption of the 
privatization decision by the labor collective. 
  5.15.3. From the moment that a labor collective adopts a 
decision to submit an application for privatization until more 
than 75 percent of the shares in the enterprise undergoing 
privatization have been sold it is prohibited to sell property, 
including immovable property, or to transfer it from the books 
of the enterprise undergoing privatization without the consent 
of the appropriate property management committee. 
  Stockholding workers in an enterprise undergoing 
privatization are exempt from taxes when selling shares 
belonging to them. 
<H3>  5.16. Additional Concessions When Privatizing State 
(Municipal) Enterprises </H3>
  The following additional concessions are prescribed when 
privatizing state (municipal) enterprises: 
  --a partnership formed solely by the workers of an 
enterprise 
where more than 50 percent of the total work force are invalids 
at the moment that the labor collective adopts a decision to 
submit a privatization application -- provided at least half the 
membership of the partnership consists of working invalids -- 
has a priority right to purchase the said enterprise, in 
accordance with a statute approved by the Russian 
Goskomimushchestvo, for its residual value with up to 80 percent 
of the cost being payable by privatization check (until 1 July 
1994); 
  if less than 50 percent but more than 10 percent of the 
total 
work force are invalids, the conditions governing the sale of 
the enterprise must include a commitment by the purchaser to 
retain the number of jobs for invalids prescribed by the 
privatization plan and provide them with special working 
conditions; 
  --a partnership formed by at least two-thirds of the total 
work force of a state (municipal) folk arts and crafts 
enterprise has a priority right to purchase the enterprise for 
its residual value with up to 80 percent of the cost being 
payable by privatization check (until 1 July 1994): 
  irrespective of the chosen option for granting concessions 
to 
labor collective members when folk arts and crafts enterprises 
are converted into open-type joint-stock enterprises, leading 
artists and craftsmen are granted the right to purchase at 
nominal cost shares equivalent to 5 percent of the authorized 
capital exclusively for privatization checks, over and above the 
concessions prescribed for the labor collective; 
  during the privatization of enterprises located in 
population 
centers with no more than 10,000 inhabitants, or in restricted 
administrative-territorial formations, with the labor 
collective's consent all inhabitants can participate in an 
exclusive-access subscription for the shares in the enterprise 
being privatized which are eligible for sale to the labor 
collective, provided the number of workers at the enterprise 
undergoing privatization totals more than half the number of 
work-capable inhabitants of the said population center; when 
everyday service enterprises in rural areas are being privatized 
the labor collective is granted a preferential right to purchase 
the enterprise provided the proposed tendering conditions are 
observed by the participants. 
  5.17. When calculating concessions to labor collective 
members during a privatization process involving the conversion 
of a state (municipal) enterprise into an open-type joint-stock 
company on the basis of the minimum wage level, this minimum 
wage level is defined as the legislatively-prescribed level as 
of 1 June 1992 or -- in cases of privatization by other methods 
-- the level as of the moment of the adoption of the Program, 
unless otherwise prescribed by privatization legislation. The 
size of any deposit or penalty is to be determined on the basis 
of the minimum wage prescribed for the date in 
question. 
<H3>  5.18. The Reorganization and Demonopolization of 
Enterprises on Privatization </H3>
  5.18.1. It is not permitted to create joint-stock companies 
(including holding companies) on the basis of concerns, unions, 
associations, and other groupings of enterprises whose 
participants include state and (or) municipal enterprises, with 
the exception of instances when their form of legal organization 
is being brought into line with Articles 9-12 of the Russian 
Federation Law "On Enterprises and Entrepreneurial Activity." 
  5.18.2. The creation of holding companies when state and 
municipal enterprises are being converted into joint-stock 
companies is effected in accordance with the Interim Statute on 
Holding Companies Created During the Conversion of State 
Enterprises Into Joint-Stock Companies, which was approved by 
the Russian Federation president's Edict No. 1392 of 16 November 
1992 "On Measures To Implement Industrial Policy During the 
Privatization of State Enterprises." 
  It is not permitted for the authorized capital of 
joint-stock 
companies created with the participation of the state (including 
holding companies) to include more than 10 percent of the shares 
of any joint-stock company created under the procedure for the 
privatization of a state (municipal) enterprise. Holding 
companies can be formed only with the prior agreement of the 
relevant organs of power and administration of the Russian 
Federation components on whose territory the enterprises 
belonging to the holding companies are located. 
  5.18.3. It is not permitted to create enterprises or to make 
contributions in the form of property to the authorized capital 
of enterprises (of any form of legal organization) or 
associations of state (municipal) enterprises whose form of 
legal organization has not been brought into line with Articles 
9-12 of the Russian Federation Law "On Enterprises and 
Entrepreneurial Activity." The legal successors of these 
associations in the shape of the founders and members 
(shareholders and stockholders) of the previously formed 
enterprises are the enterprises party to these associations 
(provided there is documentary confirmation that the latter's 
contributions were in the form of specified and other payments 
by these enterprises) or the appropriate property management 
committees (in all other instances). 
  5.18.4. It is not permitted for enterprises to be created, 
or 
contributions in the form of property to be made to the 
authorized capital of enterprises (of any form of legal 
organization), by any organs of state power and administration 
or local self-government or state or municipal institutions, 
with the exception of property management committees and 
property funds. 
  5.18.5. The privatization of state and municipal enterprises 
through the sale of shares can be effected only after they have 
been converted into open-type joint-stock companies. On 
privatization enterprises created as a result of the conversion 
of state (municipal) enterprises into other forms of legal 
organization must be converted into open-type joint-stock 
companies. 
  The rights of the state as a participant (shareholder or 
stockholder) in these enterprises is exercised by the 
appropriate property management committees or property funds. 
The latter are obliged to ensure that these enterprises are duly 
converted and also to effect the privatization of the shares in 
their capital which are in state (municipal) ownership in 
accordance with current privatization legislation. 
  5.18.6. When purchasing property, purchasing shares (making 
share payments), or purchasing stock in enterprises undergoing 
privatization (joint-stock companies, partnerships) for money: 
  --in the event of a deal for a sum exceeding 500,000 times 
the legislatively prescribed minimum wage, corporate entities 
(resident and nonresident) submit information (an official 
memorandum) on the source of the money and the legality of its 
provenance in accordance with the procedure approved jointly by 
the Federal Counterintelligence Service and the Russian 
Goskomimushchestvo; 
  --in the event of a deal for a sum exceeding 5,000 times the 
legislatively prescribed minimum wage, individuals submit a 
memorandum on their income in line with a procedure to be 
approved jointly by the Russian Federation Counterintelligence 
Service, the Russian Goskomimushchestvo, and the Russian 
Federation State Tax Service. 
  5.18.7. Decisions on removing subsidiary components freom 
enterprises in the process of their privatization are adopted by 
the appropriate property management committees by agreement with 
antimonopoly agencies and sector ministries and departments on 
the basis of decisions by the labor collectives of the 
enterprises (structural subsidiary components); decisions on 
removing such components from associations of enterprises when 
their form of legal organization in being brought into line with 
current legislation are adopted on the basis of decisions by the 
labor collectives of the enterprises taking account of the 
opinion of antimonopoly agencies and ministries and departments 
(with the exception of foreign trade associations). 
  A decision on removing structural subcomponents from 
enterprises must not violate the unity of a manufacturing 
complex. 
  5.18.8. Monopoly enterprises are to be reorganized in 
accordance with current legislation following or during the 
process of privatization. 
  When privatizing enterprises which are acknowledged under 
the 
prescribed procedure as having a dominant position on the 
Russian (federal) market, the Russian Goskomimushchestvo and 
property management committees endowed with the powers of its 
territorial agencies are entitled -- following a submission by 
the Russian Federation State Committee for Antimonopoly Policy 
and Support for New Economic Structures or its territorial 
administrations (hereinafter referred to as antimonopoly 
agencies) -- to adopt decisions: 
  --on including in the charter of a newly created joint-stock 
company requirements for mandatory prior agreement with 
antimonopoly agencies for deals in which the said company would 
acquire stock, make share payments, or buy shares in the 
authorized capital of other economic players selling analogous 
or substitutable goods (works, services) on the market; 
  --on including in a privatization plan demands for the 
mandatory prior conclusion of an agreement (contract) with the 
antimonopoly agency stipulating commitments by the enterprise to 
avoid monopoly activity and dishonest competition and penalties 
for noncompliance. 
<H5>  5.19. The Disposal of Facilities in State Ownership Abroad </H5>
  5.19.1 The privatization and disposal of state property 
abroad is effected under the procedure prescribed by Russian 
Federation laws, Russian Federation presidential edicts, or 
Russian Federation Government decrees. 
  5.19.2. The privatization (sale) of facilities in Russian 
Federation state ownership located on the territory of 
independent states which were formerly republics of the USSR is 
effected after questions relating to ownership rights are 
settled on the basis of intergovernmental agreements. 
<H3>  6. Sector Features of the Privatization of State 
(Municipal) Enterprises </H3>
  6.1 The privatization and conversion into joint-stock 
companies of state enterprises, production associations, and 
science-and-production associations in the electricity and 
nuclear power complexes; the gas, coal, oil, and oil refining 
industry and petroleum product support services; the defense 
complex; the extraction and processing of precious metals and 
precious stones; the sociocultural, municipal, and everyday 
service facilities of enterprises undergoing privatization; 
railroad transport; and the facilities of the "Rossiyskiy Nikel" 
Russian joint-stock company are governed by current Russian 
Federation presidential edicts and directives. 
  6.2. The creation of new integrated Russia-wide structures 
of 
a monopoly nature (holding companies and enterprises controlling 
the shares of joint-stock companies in the process of being 
created) is permitted in the fuel and energy and nuclear 
complexes exclusively in the instances stipulated by Russian 
Federation presidential edicts with the agreement of the organs 
of state power and administration of the components of the 
Russian Federation and the Russian Federation State Committee 
for Antimonopoly Policy and Support for New Economic Structures. 
  6.3. With a view to creating a competitive market and 
protecting the interests of consumers, the Russian Federation 
Government is to ensure within six months of the adoption of 
this Program the creation of independent joint-stock oil 
companies carrying out the extraction and refining of oil and 
also the marketing of oil and petroleum products through the 
consolidation of the holdings of stock controlled by the 
"Rosneft" state enterprises and their subsequent sale on the 
capital market. 
  Workers in Russian Federation Ministry of Fuel and Power 
uniformed service units (engaged in the prevention and 
elimination of oil and gas leaks [proyavleniye] and gushers) and 
in mine rescue service units ensuring safe mining operations in 
mining and metallurgy enterprises and the gold and diamond 
mining industry are to be granted the right to participate in 
acquiring shares in the enterprises where they operate on 
concessionary terms within the framework of the overall 
concessions granted to labor collective members. 
  6.4. The privatization of enterprises engaged in the primary 
processing of agricultural produce, fish, and marine products 
and enterprises providing production and technical services and 
material and technical backup for the agro-industrial complex is 
effected in accordance with the Russian Federation president's 
Edict N0. 1767 of 27 October 1993 "On the Regulation of Land 
Arrangements and the Development of Agrarian Reform in Russia" 
and the present Program. 
  Here the issuing of shares in the said enterprises is 
carried 
out irrespective of the number of workers or value of the fixed 
capital, with labor collective members being granted concessions 
in line with options 1 and 3. Within three months of the 
adoption of the privatization decision all other shares are 
offered at closed check auctions to the agricultural and fish 
producers and suppliers or consumers of services who are 
recognized as purchasers in accordance with Article 9 of the 
Russian Federation Law "On the Privatization of State and 
Municipal Enterprises in the Russian Federation" and also to the 
rural population of the given enterprises' raw material zone in 
accordance with a statute on specialized closed check auctions 
to be approved by the Russian Goskomimushchestvo. 
  Unplaced shares in agro-industrial complex enterprises are 
sold at specialized check auctions without restrictions as to 
the participants. 
  When enterprises producing tobacco products are converted 
into open-type joint-stock companies, a decision on issuing a 
"golden share" is made. 
  6.5. The privatization and sale of released military 
property 
(with the exception of arms and ammunition) is effected by the 
Russian Federation Ministry of Defense in accordance with the 
procedure laid down by Russian Federation presidential Edicts 
No. 1518 of 30 November 1992 "On the Procedure for Reorganizing 
and Utilizing Released Military Property" and No. 1659 of 28 
December 1992 "On Measures for the Social Protection of 
Servicemen, Former Servicemen, and Members of Their Families. 
  6.6. The privatization of publishing houses, printing 
enterprises, and wholesale book trading enterprises under the 
Russian Federation Committee for the Press is effected in 
accordance with a statute to be approved by the Russian 
Federation Government. 
  When wholesale book trading enterprises are converted into 
open-type joint-stock companies a "golden share" is issued for a 
three-year period. When publishing houses are converted into 
a open-type joint-stock companies, the editorial office 
personnel of the newspapers and magazines which were formerly 
part of these publishing houses, including the creative 
personnel of newspapers and magazines, are granted the right to 
participate in an exclusive-access subscription for shares. 
  6.7. The privatization of facilities in the scientific and 
technical fields is effected in accordance with a statute to be 
approved by the Russian Federation Government. 
  6.8. The privatization of facilities and enterprises 
belonging to the "Communications" sector (with the exception of 
"Rospechat" network retail facilities and enterprises) is to be 
effected in accordance with Russian Federation Government 
decrees. 
  6.9. The privatization of sanatorium and resort facilities 
and enterprises in federal ownership is effected in accordance 
with Russian Federation Government decrees. 
  When wholesale trading enterprises and sanatorium and resort 
facilities and enterprises in federal ownership are being 
converted into open-type joint-stock companies concessions are 
only granted to labor collective members in line with option 1 
laid down by the present Program. 
  6.10. The privatization of physical culture and sports 
facilities is effected in accordance with Russian Federation 
Government decrees. 
  6.11. When timber procurement facilities are being 
privatized 
through the sale of shares in open-type joint-stock companies 
and structural subsidiary components engaged in timber industry 
activity are removed from timber enterprises, all the personnel 
of the former integrated timber enterprises are permitted to 
participate in an exclusive-access subscription for shares. When 
shares in retail trading and public catering enterprises 
providing services for Federal Forestry Service enterprises and 
organizations are being sold at check auctions, the range of 
purchasers is to be restricted to lumbering settlements. 
  The above procedure extends to all structural subsidiary 
components removed from Russian Federal Forestry Service 
integrated timber enterprises engaged in timber industry 
activity (dressing of timber from major fellings and processing). 
  6.12. Motor vehicles and water transport system ships 
belonging to organizations, establishments, and enterprises 
(including those undergoing privatization) are sold at auction. 
A special privatization scheme involved mixed payments is 
applied here: 50 percent in checks and 50 percent in money until 
1 July 1994, and money alone after 1 July 1994, with: 
  --30 percent of the money revenue going to the 
organizations, 
establishments, and enterprises from which the said property has 
been removed; 
  --70 percent of the money revenue being shared equally 
between the property management committee and the property fund. 
These funds going to these privatization bodies are channeled 
into financing the privatization process. 
  6.13. The privatization of cultural facilities (including 
moviemaking facilities and enterprises) in federal ownership is 
effected in accordance with a procedure to be approved by the 
Russian Federation Government. 
  During the privatization of cultural facilities (including 
moviemaking facilities and enterprise) in federal ownership 
through the sale of shares in open-type joint-stock companies, a 
"golden share" is issued and retained in state ownership for a 
period of up to three years to prevent a change of use of such 
facilities. 
  6.14. If the authorized capital of an enterprise undergoing 
privatization excludes social or everyday service facilities or 
housing facilities and if their transfer to municipal ownership 
has been stipulated, the appropriate organs of local 
self-government must accept them onto their books within no more 
than six months of the approval of the privatization plan and 
conclude contracts with the enterprises for the maintenance of 
these facilities, if necessary maintaining with the enterprise 
undergoing privatization which formerly had these facilities on 
its books a contractual relationship stipulating the 
enterprise's commitments in terms of the maintenance of 
facilities in the housing, social, and cultural fields. 
  6.15. When facilities and enterprises producing babyfood 
products are being privatized their sale by auction is 
precluded; and when they are converted into open-type 
joint-stock companies a decision to issue a "golden share" is 
made. 
  6.16. Intradepartmental trade and public catering facilities 
providing services for Russian Federal Forestry Service 
establishments, enterprises, and organizations are privatized in 
accordance with a special statute to be approved by the Russian 
Goskomimushchestvo taking the Russian Federal Forestry Service's 
proposals into account. 
  6.17. When state (municipal) enterprises are privatized the 
new owner is the legal successor to all rights and obligations 
in terms of ensuring fire safety. 
  The fire safety agreement must be renegotiated within three 
months of the registration of the enterprise. 
  6.18. The privatization of the foreign trade associations of 
the Russian Federation Ministry of Foreign Economic Relations 
and other Russian Federation ministries and departments is 
effected in accordance with a statute to be approved by the 
Russian Federation Government following a submission from the 
Russian Goskomimushchestvo and the Russian Ministry of Foreign 
Economic Relations. 
  6.19. The privatization of civil defense facilities, with 
the 
exception of those indicated in Section 1.1, is effected in 
accordance with a statute to be approved by the Russian 
Federation Government. 
  6.20. When experimental plants within the Russian Federation 
Committee for Standards, Metrology, and Certification system are 
converted into open-type joint-stock companies a decision to 
issue a "golden share" is made. 
  6.21. Russian Federation Ministry of Education enterprises 
are transformed solely into open-type joint-stock companies 
irrespective of the value of their fixed capital. When the said 
enterprises are converted into joint-stock companies the Russian 
Goskomimushchestvo can adopt a decision to issue a "golden 
share" when their shares are issued. 
  A necessary condition for the conversion of this ministry's 
enterprises into open-type joint-stock companies is their 
mandatory retention of two-thirds of the specialized educational 
output they produce (in terms of product list and volume) at the 
moment the decision on privatization is adopted. 
  6.22. Motorized transport and highway enterprises and 
facilities which are mobilization facilities or which have 
constant mobilization tasks are privatized taking into account 
the opinion of the Russian State Committee for Affairs of Civil 
Defense, Emergency Situations, and Elimination of Natural 
Disasters. 
  6.23. All enterprises and research and design organizations 
under the jurisdiction of the Russian Federation Committee for 
Metallurgy are privatized taking into account the opinion of 
this committee and only by selling shares in open-type 
joint-stock companies irrespective of the size and value of 
their fixed capital. 
  6.24. The privatization of folk art enterprises is effected 
with the enterprise mandatorily retaining its specialism and 
taking into account the opinion of the Russian Federation State 
Committee on Industrial Policy. 
  6.25. When hotel complexes, hotels, motels, boarding houses, 
camp sites, and tourist facilities in federal or state 
(municipal) ownership are converted into joint-stock companies 
members of the labor collective are only granted concessions 
under Option 1 of the concessions prescribed by this Program. 
  6.26. A "golden share" is issued when medical industry 
facilities and enterprises, pharmaceutical bases (storehouses), 
and medical equipment bases, as well as enterprises and 
facilities in the scientific and technical sphere of the 
chemical complex which incorporate manufacturing facilities 
involving toxic substances graded in risk categories 1 and 2 are 
converted into joint-stock companies. 
  6.27. Decisions on the privatization of enterprises and 
facilities producing chemical agents and temporary 
incapacitators are adopted once the work to destroy these 
special means and decontaminate equipment is completed. 
  6.28. The privatization of passenger transport enterprises 
which ship freight as well as passengers is effected in 
accordance with decrees of the Russian Federation Government. 
  6.29. The conversion into open-type joint-stock companies 
and 
privatization of enterprises and facilities of the Russian 
Federal Geodesy and Cartography Service referred to in Section 
2.2. of this Program is effected with the mandatory retention of 
the enterprise's specialism and taking into account the opinion 
of the Russian Federal Geodesy and Cartography Service. 
  6.30. Rural trade, public catering, and everyday service 
facilities and enterprises whose fixed capital has a book value 
as of 1 January 1992 of no more than R0.5 million are to be sold 
solely by tender and investment tender. 
  6.31. Geological enterprises' structural subsidiary 
components units and facilities not subject to privatization are 
excluded when the said enterprise is privatized. Shares in 
geological joint-stock companies assigned to federal ownership 
can be sold ahead of schedule by decision of the Russian 
Federation Government. 
  6.32. One of the following options for valuing property may 
be employed when facilities and enterprises processing the ore 
of precious metals and precious and semiprecious stones are 
proposed by proposal of the labor collective in accordance with 
the decree of the Russian Federation Government: 
  Option 1 -- without including precious and semiprecious 
stones and precious metals in the value of the purchased 
property. In that case the precious and semiprecious stones, as 
well as precious metals, remain in state ownership and are used 
by the enterprise in accordance with a contract concluded with 
the Russian Federation Committee for Precious Metals and 
Precious Stones. 
  Option 2 -- including precious and semiprecious stones and 
precious metals in the value of the purchased property at the 
prices in effect at the moment the privatization plan is 
ratified. 
  6.33. When state and municipal enterprises are privatized 
the 
procedure for taking into consideration the environmental factor 
and conditions for safe working at chemically hazardous 
facilities, those where there is a danger of explosion or fire, 
and toxically hazardous facilities, including questions relating 
to the conducting of an environmental audit; for reflecting this 
in privatization plans and tendering terms; for setting 
requirements relating to the environmental rehabilitation 
[sanatsiya] of enterprises; for setting preferential costs for 
nature conservation property; and for creating environmental 
rehabilitation funds at enterprises is established by the 
Russian Goskomimushchestvo with consideration for proposals 
submitted by the Ministry of the Environment and Natural 
Resources of the Russian Federation and the appropriate sector 
ministries and departments. 
  The said ministry and the Russian Goskomimushchestvo are to 
approve a list for registering environmentally hazardous 
enterprises during the privatization process. 
  Privatization of enterprises facing shutdown on 
environmental 
grounds is effected in accordance with a statute to be ratified 
by the Russian Federation Government. 
<H5>  7. Conditions for the Provision of Credit for Privatization </H5>
  Commercial banks of the Russian Federation and foreign banks 
can extend credit for privatization transactions in accordance 
with current legislation. 
  The Central Bank of the Russian Federation can only assign 
credit resources to fund the holding of check auctions. 
  Local privatization programs can make provision for the 
assigning of credit resources for this purpose using funds at 
the disposal of the relevant local organs of power. 
  The Government of the Russian Federation, on behalf of the 
Russian Federation, must ensure the receipt of preferential 
credit from international financial organizations (banks) to 
support the process of privatization in Russia. 
<H5>  8. Use of Privatization Checks </H5>
  This Program implements a mechanism for privatization based 
on the use of privatization checks in accordance with the 
Russian Federation president's Edicts No. 914 of 14 August 1992, 
No. 1228 of 14 October 1992, No. 1229 of 14 October 1992, No. 
1304 of 26 October 1992, No. 1391 of 16 November 1992, No. 1705 
of 31 December 1992, No. 7 of 10 January 1993, No. 216 of 12 
February 1993, and No. 2004 of 24 November 1993 during the 
period of validity of the privatization checks through 1 July 
1994. 
  8.1. Citizens of Russia and other people entitled to receive 
privatization checks use 1992-issue privatization checks with a 
nominal value of R10,000 to acquire privatization facilities. 
  The issuing of privatization checks to people on long sea 
voyages and lengthy duty tours is extended. 
  8.2. Privatization checks are used in privatization for 
purchasers to pay for the following facilities: 
  --enterprises, their subsidiary components, property, shares 
in joint-stock companies, and a proportion of the authorized 
capital of enterprises in federal ownership and the state 
ownership of republics within the Russian Federation, krays, 
oblasts, the autonomous oblast, autonomous okrugs, the cities of 
Moscow and St. Petersburg, and in municipal ownership; 
  --land plots in accordance with the procedure prescribed by 
the Russian Federation president's Edicts No. 631 of 14 June 
1992 "On Ratifying the Procedure for the Sale of Land Plots 
During the Privatization of State and Municipal Enterprises and 
the Expansion of and Additional Construction at These 
Enterprises, As Well As Those [Land Plots] Given to Citizens and 
Their Associations for Entrepreneurial Activity" and No. 1228 of 
14 October 1992 "On the Sale of Housing Stock, Land Plots, and 
Municipal Property for Privatization Checks"; 
  --shares in check investment funds; 
  --shares in social security check investment funds; 
  --property under right-to-buy leasing contracts. 
  The size of the payments subject to payment in privatization 
checks is fixed by edicts of the Russian Federation president 
and this Program. 
  Mindful of the sector and regional features of privatization 
the size of the payments for privatization checks can be changed 
in accordance with edicts of the Russian Federation president. 
  8.3. The creation of other systems, in addition to the 
system 
of privatization checks, for the free transfer to the ownership 
of citizens of the Russian Federation of state and municipal 
property in the republics, krays, oblasts, the autonomous 
oblast, autonomous okrugs, the cities of Moscow and St. 
Petersburg, and in rayons and cities, apart from the transfer of 
stock from the FARP and in accordance with Option 1 for 
concessions during flotation in the privatization process 
envisaged by this Program, is not allowed. 
  8.4. Refusal to accept privatization checks as a means of 
payment during privatization is prohibited. No taxes are levied 
when property funds accept privatization checks as a means of 
payment during privatization. Intermediaries conducting check 
auctions in accordance with Russian Federation privatization 
legislation on the instructions of property funds are exempted 
from value-added tax on the expenditure involved in holding the 
check auctions, expenditure which they are refunded by property 
funds. 
  8.5. The state guarantees the owner of a privatization check 
the right to use the privatization check to acquire facilities 
being privatized in accordance with the legislation of the 
Russian Federation. 
  8.6. Privatization checks can circulate in cash and noncash 
form. Depositories are being set up to issue, handle, and 
store shares in privatized enterprise and privatization checks 
in noncash form (in the form of an entry in their accounts), and 
also to receive and process the instructions of privatization 
check owners and stockholders; a statute on these depositories 
is to be ratified by the Russian Goskomimushchestvo in 
conjunction with the Commission for Securities and Stock 
Exchanges under the president of the Russian Federation. 
  8.7. Operations to buy and sell privatization checks and 
acquire securities with them, including shares in check 
investment funds and shares in privatized enterprises, are not 
taxable. 
  The value of a privatization check issued to people entitled 
to receive them in accordance with current legislation is not 
included in citizens' total taxable income and is not liable to 
corporate income tax. 
  The income of corporate entities obtained from the 
difference 
between the value of check investment fund shares when they are 
first placed and the value of the fund's shares when they are 
sold at a higher price is not taxable. Check investment funds 
and investment institutions are exempt from property tax. The 
services of a depository and auditing firms offered to check 
investment funds and investment institutions are exempt from 
value added tax. 
  8.8. The Government of the Russian Federation and the 
supreme 
organs of executive power of components of the Federation fund 
the preparation and publication in every region of collected 
information on privatization and property fund bulletins 
providing that this collected information publishes mandatorily 
the schedules for the sale of facilities, including the holding 
of check auctions, enterprises' privatization plans, and lists 
of privatized enterprises, as well as methodological and 
normative documents pertaining to problems of privatization. 
  8.9. With a view to preventing abuse, it is prohibited to 
borrow and lend privatization checks, accept and hand over 
privatization checks as security, and carry out other operations 
using privatization checks for which Russian Federation 
privatization legislation no provision. 
  8.10. The issuing, holding, redemption, and destruction of 
privatization checks is funded by monies from the republic 
budget of the Russian Federation, and also by monies from 
privatization available to the corresponding property management 
committees and property funds. 
  All organizations, enterprises, and establishments which 
issue certificates of the deposition of privatization checks and 
which receive, hold, redeem, and destroy privatization checks 
are obliged to keep records and submit a report on the movement 
of privatization checks in accordance with the procedure 
prescribed by the Russian Goskomimushchestvo. 
  8.11. Around 10 percent of the total number of shares in a 
joint-stock company sold at a check auction are allowed to be 
sold at auction for rubles (provided that no less than 29 
percent of the shares in the said joint-stock company are sold 
at the check auction), with the money from the sale directed to 
covering the cost of holding the check auctions. In this process 
30 percent of the receipts is directed into the funding by 
property management committees of services to hold and destroy 
privatization checks, while the rest of the receipts are 
directed to property funds to cover the cost of holding check 
auctions and redeem privatization checks. 
  In this case amendment of the second section of the 
privatization plan is not required. 
<H5>  9. Developing a Capital Market </H5>
  9.1. Independent registrars [registratory], depositories, 
and 
accounting organizations are set up in order to ensure the 
process of the movement of capital (buying and selling of 
stocks), and also to keep registers of stockholders and the 
noncash movement of privatization checks and shares on the 
country's territory. 
  A statute on the register of stockholders is to be ratified 
by the Russian Goskomimushchestvo jointly with the Commission on 
Securities and Stock Exchanges under the president of the 
Russian Federation. 
  9.2. Responsibility for the accumulation and redemption of 
used checks is assigned to property funds (or, in the absence of 
property funds, to the appropriate property management 
committees), and for their destruction to property management 
committees. 
  9.3. Investment funds of all types do not have the right to 
exchange shares issued by them for shares in joint-stock 
companies set up in the process of privatization which are held 
by property funds. 
  9.4. Legal entities engaging in investment activity in 
accordance with the procedure prescribed for investment funds 
are obliged to bring their articles of association 
[uchreditelnyye dokumenty] into line with the legislation of the 
Russian Federation regulating the procedure for the creation and 
activity of investment funds. 
  Specialized investment privatization funds, which accumulate 
citizens' privatization checks, are entitled to have no more 
than 25 percent of the securities of a single issuer [emitent] 
in their assets, and also to acquire and have in their assets 
sshares in other investment funds. 
  For the first two years following registration the 
investment 
activity of specialized privatization investment funds, which 
accumulate citizens' privatization checks, is exempt from: 
  --advance payments of profits tax; 
  --tax on dividends paid by enterprises on shares in the 
possession of specialized privatization investment funds 
accumulating citizens' privatization checks; 
  --tax paid on registering a security issue prospectus. 
  Specialized privatization investment funds accumulating 
citizens' privatization checks are exempt from paying 
value-added tax on transactions to acquire shares in privatized 
enterprises. 
  9.5. With a view to regulating the development of the 
securities market it shall be established that, prior to Russian 
Federation legislation introducing norms regulating the activity 
of investment banks: 
  --banks cannot buy a stake (holding, shares) in privatized 
enterprises and specialized privatization investment funds 
accumulating citizens' privatization checks with either money or 
with privatization checks which they have acquired, nor can they 
own more than 10 percent of the shares in any joint-stock 
company, nor can they hold more than 5 percent of the shares in 
joint-stock companies among their assets; 
  --banks can accept privatization checks and securities in 
privatized enterprises and investment funds from citizens and 
legal entities for custody. 
  9.6. In the event of a privatization plan not providing 
dates 
for the sale of a block of shares in an enterprise under the 
jurisdiction of a corresponding property fund, this block of 
shares must be sold before the end of the third month from the 
moment that it is handed over to the fund. 
  9.7. In order for servicemen, civilian personnel of the 
Russian Federation Armed Forces and other ministries and 
departments with troops formations, people discharged from 
military service, and members of the families of the said 
categories of citizens to use privatization checks, organs of 
state administration are to do their utmost to assist current 
and newly created check investment funds for the social 
protection of servicemen. 
  To this end a fund with at least 75 percent of citizens of 
the aforementioned categories among its stockholders can be a 
check investment fund for the social protection of servicemen. 
  9.8. The chairman of the appropriate property fund bears 
personal responsibility for compliance with the timeframes for 
the sale of enterprise shares laid down in the privatization 
plan (the plan or schedule for holding check auctions). In the 
event of property funds failing to comply with the timeframe for 
the sale of shares, on the expiry of 15 days from the date laid 
down in the privatization plan property management committees 
are obliged to start selling shares transferred to the fund when 
privatization plans have been unfulfilled. 
  9.9. Property management committees are responsible for 
setting up in every region the requisite network of independent 
registrars and depositories sufficient to meet the needs of 
joint-stock companies as regards keeping registers of 
stockholders and investment funds. 
  9.10. Protection of stockholders' rights. 
  9.10.1. With a view to protecting the rights of open-type 
joint-stock companies' stockholders it is established that: 
  --all ordinary shares in open-type joint-stock companies 
irrespective of their time of issue are equal in terms of the 
rights granted to stockholders and the dividends paid thereon; 
  --the annual meeting of an open-type joint-stock company's 
stockholders is held no later than 120 calendar days after the 
end of the fiscal year. The joint-stock company's balance sheet, 
the statement of income (annual report), and the auditing 
commission report based on the results of its yearly inspection, 
submitted to the annual meeting of stockholders, are approved by 
the joint-stock company's board of directors no later than 60 
calendar days after the end of the fiscal year. In the event of 
the board of directors not approving the joint-stock company's 
balance sheet it is submitted in accordance with established 
procedure to the tax inspectorate, which schedules an audit of 
the joint-stock company's funds. 
  9.10.2. It is established that the following decisions are 
only to be adopted at a meeting of stockholders and with the 
agreement of the owners of three-fourths of the ordinary shares 
in the open-type joint-stock company, present in person or by 
proxy: 
  --on amendments and addenda to the joint-stock company's 
charter; 
  --on changing the size of the joint-stock company's 
authorized capital; 
  --barring the redemption of shares bought by the company, on 
the pledging, leasing, sale, exchange, and other alienation of 
any property defined in the joint-stock company's articles of 
association, and also if the size of the transaction or value of 
the property subject to the transaction exceeds 25 percent of 
the authorized capital, or if the joint-stock company's auditing 
commission does not decide to approve the deal; 
  --on participation in holding companies, associations of 
enterprises, and financial-industrial groups; 
  --on the reorganization and liquidation of a joint-stock 
company. The provisions of this paragraph extend to open-type 
joint-stock companies set up in the process of privatizing state 
(municipal) enterprises in the event that no more than 25 
percent of the shares are in state (municipal) ownership at the 
time of the stockholders' general meeting. 
  9.10.3. The setting of any restrictions or conditions on 
stockholders selling their shares in open-type joint-stock 
companies is prohibited. 
  9.10.4. An open-type joint-stock company's board of 
directors 
with no less than seven members -- or no less than nine members 
for joint-stock companies with more than 10,000 stockholders -- 
is elected at a stockholders' meeting. In the elections for the 
board of directors each ordinary share has the same number of 
votes as the number of members of the board. In the election 
stockholders can cast all or part of the votes attaching to 
their ordinary shares for one or several candidates for board 
membership. The candidates who gain the largest number of votes 
are deemed to have been elected to the board of directors. 
  Each member of the board of directors has one vote at the 
board meeting. Stockholders who are employees of the joint-stock 
company cannot comprise more than one-third of the members of 
that company's board. 
  9.10.5. Shares which are part of the assets of the 
joint-stock company which issued them do not come into play at 
the voting at the general meeting of the joint-stock company's 
stockholders. The quorum at the meeting is determined without 
these shares being taken into consideration. 
  9.10.6. Open-type joint-stock companies cannot be converted 
into closed-type joint-stock companies or limited-liability 
partnerships. 
  9.10.7. A joint-stock company must send out the following to 
stockholders by registered post no later than 30 calendar days 
prior to the date of the stockholders' meeting: 
  --written notification of the time of the meeting and its 
venue; 
  --an agenda for the stockholders' meeting ratified by the 
board of directors; 
  --information on the points on the stockholders' meeting 
agenda, including a ballot paper for the elections to the board 
of directors and a ballot paper for the elections to the 
auditing commission. 
  The procedure for preparing for and holding the general 
meeting of joint-stock company stockholders is ratified by the 
Russian Federation president's Commission for Securities and 
Stock Exchanges. 
<H5>  10. Utilization of Foreign Investment </H5>
  10.1. Foreign investors can take part in auctions (including 
check auctions), tenders, and investment tenders, as well as 
buying privatization checks for use as a means of payment in the 
privatization process provided that mandatory subsequent 
notification is given to the Russian Finance Ministry. No 
additional permission from Russian Federation state committees, 
ministries, and departments, organs of state administration of 
the republics within the Russian Federation, krays, oblasts, the 
autonomous oblast, autonomous okrugs, or the cities of Moscow 
and St. Petersburg is required for foreign corporate entities or 
individuals to utilize privatization checks in the privatization 
process. 
  When deals are being completed with foreign investors the 
sole vendors of state and municipal property will be the 
corresponding property funds (property management committees). 
  If foreign investors are the only participants in an 
auction, 
tender, or investment tender, enterprises may be sold to them. 
In this case the relevant property fund makes a special 
valuation of the enterprise's property using a procedure 
ratified by the Russian Goskomimushchestvo in conjunction with 
the Russian Finance Ministry. 
  Foreign investors will be allowed to participate in the 
privatization of facilities and enterprises in the sphere of 
trade, public catering, and everyday services to the population, 
as well as small (less than 200 registered workers or a book 
value of less than R1 million as of 1 January 1992) industrial, 
construction, or motor transport enterprises only with the 
permission of local organs of power or organs authorized by them. 
  Decisions to possibly permit foreign investors to take part 
in the privatization of facilities and enterprises in the 
defense industry (those where defense orders account for more 
than 30 percent of total output) or the oil and gas industry, 
enterprises extracting and processing strategic ores, precious 
and semiprecious stones, or radioactive and rare-earth elements, 
or the transport and communication enterprises indicated in 
Section 2.2 of this Program are made by the Russian Federation 
Government or the governments of republics within the Russian 
Federation (depending on the type of state ownership) at the 
same time as decisions to permit the privatization of the 
aforesaid facilities and enterprises. And, following the holding 
of a check (money) auction (tender) the organizers send the 
Russian Federation Government and the Russian Federation Federal 
Counterintelligence Service information on the successful 
foreign bidders. The Russian Federation Federal 
Counterintelligence Service is entitled to submit to the Russian 
Federation Government within one month a reasoned conclusion on 
the need to prohibit the acquisition of shares, stakes, 
holdings, or property by the aforesaid foreign investors. The 
Russian Federation Government adopts a corresponding decree on 
this basis. 
  The utilization of foreign investment in the privatization 
of 
state and municipal enterprises located within a closed 
territorial formation is not permitted, save in cases stipulated 
by Russian Federation Government decrees. 
  There are no other restrictions on foreign investors' 
participation in privatization. 
  10.2. On completion of a deal transactions with foreign 
investors (resident and nonresident) are conducted in the 
currency of the Russian Federation or in privatization checks. 
  10.3. Foreign individuals who are not registered as 
entrepreneurs in their country of origin are recognized as 
foreign investors in respect of their participation in 
privatization. 
<H3>  11. Procedure for the Relationship of State Privatization 
Organs Among Themselves, With Other Organs of State 
Administration, and With Budgets at All Levels </H3>
  11.1. Property funds acting in accordance with the Statute 
on 
the Russian Federal Property Fund (property fund) ratified by 
Russian Federation Presidential Edict No. 2173 of 17 December 
1993 are the vendors of state (municipal) enterprises and other 
state-owned facilities, unless specified to the contrary by 
existing privatization legislation. 
  In areas where no property funds exist, their functions are 
carried out by the relevant property management committees. 
  Property funds in the republics, krays, oblasts, the 
autonomous oblast, autonomous okrugs, and the cities of Moscow 
and St. Petersburg (as well as other major cities by agreement 
with the Russian Federal Property Fund) are entitled to 
privatize federal property (apart from shares in enterprises 
with an authorized capital of over R500 million). 
  11.2. From the time a labor collective or corresponding 
property management committee decides to privatize an 
enterprise, the powers delegated to a ministry, department, or 
organ of local administration lapse, with the exception of the 
right to conclude contracts with the leaders of the privatized 
enterprise. 
  11.3. Russian Federation ministries and departments 
elaborate 
and coordinate with the Russian Federation State Committee for 
Antimonopoly Policy and Support for New Economic Structures and 
submit to the Russian Goskomimushchestvo recommendations 
relating to the features of the privatization of enterprises in 
their sector, unless specified to the contrary by Section 6 of 
this Program. 
  The Russian Goskomimushchestvo elaborates provisions on the 
procedure for privatizing facilities and enterprises in the 
various sectors stipulated in Section 6 of this Program, taking 
account of the views of the Russian Federation State Committee 
for Antimonopoly Policy and Support for New Economic Structures. 
  11.4. In order to exercise ownership powers at stockholders' 
meetings at joint-stock companies where blocks of shares are 
held by the state or where a decision has been made to issue a 
"golden share," property management committees at the relevant 
level can invite representatives of the relevant Russian 
Federation ministries and departments to represent those 
ministries and departments. 
  Management representatives and employees of joint-stock 
companies cannot represent the state at stockholders' meetings 
or on the board of directors. 
  11.5. Privatization organs in Russian Federation components 
(property management committees and property funds) effect the 
privatization of federally owned facilities -- with the 
exception of facilities where privatization is restricted in 
accordance with Paragraphs 2.1, 2.2, and 2.3 of this Program -- 
without any need for additional coordination with any organs of 
state power or Russian Federation departments. 
  11.6. Local property management committees and property 
funds 
collect and report figures on privatization and submit to 
statistical organs reports of data on its progress in the form 
laid down by the Russian Federation State Committee for 
Statistics and the Russian Goskomimushchestvo; this work is 
funded by the Russian Federation State Committee for Statistics. 
Enterprises and organizations are responsible for the accuracy 
of the figures. 
<H5>  12. Requirements of Local Privatization Programs </H5>
  12.1. Local privatization programs are elaborated by the 
property management committees of republics within the Russian 
Federation, krays, oblasts, the autonomous oblast, autonomous 
okrugs, cities (apart from cities under rayon jurisdiction), and 
rayons (apart from rayons in cities) and are adopted by the 
relevant local organs of state power which have the right to set 
subordinate organs of state power and administration (local 
government organs) privatization tasks in accordance with the 
present Program. 
  12.2. Local privatization programs must be elaborated in 
accordance with the requirements of the present Program and 
ratified no later than two months following its publication. 
After this, local programs will be published in the press organs 
of the relevant organs of state power and presented to the 
Russian Goskomimushchestvo. 
  12.3. Local privatization programs must: 
  --not contravene the present Program, not introduce 
additional restrictions on the privatization of facilities and 
enterprises; 
  --ensure that the demands and tasks established by the 
present Program are fully carried out. 
  Local privatization programs must include: 
  --a list of enterprises subject to privatization; 
  --proposals on the privatization of enterprises effected 
only 
with the permission of the Russian Federation Government and the 
Russian Goskomimushchestvo; 
  --a list of mothballed facilities and facilitiesin state 
(municipal) ownership whose construction is incomplete, for 
which the normative deadline for construction has run out, and 
which are eligible for privatization; 
  --targets for local organs of power and administration 
concerning the privatization of facilities in municipal 
ownership, subdivided into sectors in accordance with the 
specified indicators determined by the present Program; these 
targets include the mandattory targets set by the State 
Privatization Program for 1992 if they have not been achieved 
earlier; 
  --the schedule for conducting check auctions for all 
enterprises converted into open-type joint-stock companies; 
  --a prediction of receipts, including in the form of 
privatization checks. 
  12.4. The forms and deadlines for presenting statistics for 
the fulfillment of the targets set by the present Program are 
determined by the Russian Goskomimushchestvo by agreement with 
the Russian Federation State Committee for Statistics. 
  12.5. Personal responsibility for carrying out local 
privatization programs is placed on heads of administration and 
chairmen of property management committees and property funds at 
all levels. 
  12.6. The Russian Goskomimushchestvo is made responsible for 
supervision of the implementation of local privatization 
programs. 
<H3>  13. Measures To Stimulate the Implementation of the Russian 
Federation State Privatization Program </H3>
  With the aim of intensifying the interest of regions, 
enterprises, and property management committees and funds 
carrying out privatization in implementing the present Program, 
it is to be laid down that: 
  --enterprises being privatized may be granted state aid and 
concessions on a competition basis toward for the implementation 
of relevant programs. Enterprises which have displayed active 
assistance to property funds in the full implementation, within 
the deadline, of privatization plans, with all other conditions 
being equal, have definite priority in obtaining state aid and 
concessions; 
  --the granting of financial resources to regions takes their 
implementation of the State Privatization Program into account. 
Regions which have not carried out the requirements of Russian 
Federation legislation on privatization, including those which 
do not accept privatization checks, will not be granted 
financial aid; 
  --components of the Russian Federation (in respect of 
facilities which belong to them) and relevant organs of local 
self-government (in respect of facilities in municipal 
ownership) which have adopted decisions to increase the 
proportion of shares (property) sold for privatization checks as 
compared with the minimum established by the present Program, 
have a priority right to receive financial aid and preferential 
credits from federal organs of state power in meeting 
commitments to the federal budget; 
  --out of the monies they receive from privatization, apart 
from monies received from the sale of released military property 
(which is under the operational control of the Russian 
Federation Armed Forces, the Russian Federation Federal 
Counterintelligence Service, the Russian Federation Ministry of 
Internal Affairs, and other Russian Federation ministries and 
departments), the Russian Goskomimushchestvo and the Russian 
Federal Property Fund have the right to award bonuses to the 
tune of at least 10 percent of all the monies remaining at their 
disposal to workers of the Russian Federation State Committee 
for Antimonopoly Policy and Support for New Economic Structures 
and its territorial administrations, sector ministries, 
committees, and departments, and local property committees and 
funds who have achieved the best results in implementing the 
present Program; such bonuses are paid without restriction on 
the number of multiples of monthly salary [used as the basis for 
computing bonuses] on the basis of proposals by the 
aforementioned organs of state administration; 
  --foreign technical aid and foreign credits are granted as a 
priority to enterprises which conduct their activity in the 
sphere of production and where the proportion of state property 
in their authorized capital is less than 25 percent (apart from 
those indicated in Section 2.1 and Point 2.2.6) unless otherwise 
stipulated by international (intergovernmental) agreements. 
  Monies and material assets granted by way of foreign 
technical aid and foreign credits channeled into supporting 
privatization in the Russian Federation are exempt from all 
types of taxation as well as from customs taxes and duties. 
<H5>  14. Features of Privatization in the Regions </H5>
  14.1. Property management committees and property funds of 
components of the Russian Federation will, by agreement with the 
Russian Goskomimushchestvo, issue normative acts, including on 
the privatization of facilities in federal ownership, in the 
event of the absence of model or standard normative acts 
elaborated by the Russian Goskomimushchestvo, on condition that 
the privatization procedure and deadline are observed. 
  The aforementioned normative acts cannot contravene Russian 
Federation legislation on privatization, and this includes 
changing or amplifying methods of privatization. They cannot 
establish the procedure for the coordination, authorization, and 
ratification of documents -- or other procedures not envisaged 
by Russian Federation legislation and edicts of the Russian 
Federation president -- for the passing of documents concerning 
privatization by organs of state power and administration, a 
list of which is provided for by Russian Federation legislation 
on privatization and is considered to be comprehensive. 
Following the issue of the relevant documents adopted by federal 
organs of state power, the action of normative acts adopted by 
organs of state power of components of the Russian Federation is 
discontinued. 
  14.2. Organs of state power and administration of republics 
within the Russian Federation, krays, oblasts, the autonomous 
oblast, autonomous okrugs, the cities of Moscow and St. 
Petersburg, and also organs of local self-government have the 
right to adopt decisions in respect of enterprises and 
facilities named in Section 2.4. of the present Program: 
  --on retaining a controlling interest in state (municipal) 
ownership for a period of up to three years by agreement with 
the Russian Goskomimushchestvo; 
  --on issuing a "golden share" during the issuing of shares 
for a period of up to three years without coordination with the 
Russian Goskomimushchestvo; on determining the method of 
privatizing enterprises irrespective of the number of workers 
and the value of the capital assets. 
  14.3. During the elaboration of privatization programs of 
republics within the Russian Federation, krays, oblasts, the 
autonomous oblast, autonomous okrugs, and the cities of Moscow 
and St. Petersburg, Russian Federation organs of state power 
have the right to elaborate compulsory requirements for the 
privatization programs of the aforesaid Russian Federation 
components. 
  14.4. With the aim of taking regional specific features of 
privatization more fully into account, by decision of the 
relevant property management committees, with the agreement of 
the Russian Goskomimushchestvo, the following special additional 
methods of privatization may be used for any facilities in 
federal ownership, the ownership of components of the Russian 
Federation, and municipal ownership (apart from those mentioned 
in Sections 2.1 and 6 of the present Program): 


Name of Region                          Methods of Privatization 

Zones of socioeconomic disaster         The sale of all the property complex 
according to the list ratified by the   of an enterprise according to an 
Russian Federation Government           investment tender (with a commitment 
                                        by the purchaser to maintain 
                                        employment for the workers) without 
                                        granting concessions to labor 
                                        collectives 

Regions of the Far North                The procedure set forth in Appendis No 
                                        2 to the Program 

Agricultural Regions                    The sale of facilities in trade, 
                                        public catering and domestic services 
                                        by commercial tender retaining the 
                                        enterprises' specialization for a 
                                        period of up to 5 years and granting 
                                        an annual subsidy to the privatized 
                                        enterprise 

Regions which have achieved the         All decisions on privatization which 
highest indicators in conducting        come under Point 2.2 (except for 
privatization (according to the list    Points 2.2.4, 2.2.5, 2.2.6, 2.2.12, 
ratified by the Russian Federation      2.2.15 and 2.2.21 of the Program) are 
Government                              adopted directly by the property 
                                        management committees of the republics 
                                        withing the Russian Federation, krays, 
                                        oblasts, the autonomous oblast, 
                                        autonomous okrugs, and the cities of 
                                        Moscow and St. Petersburg without 
                                        obtaining authorization from the 
                                        Russian Federation Government. 


  14.5. The privatization of sanatoriums, health resorts, and 
tourist excursion facilities in the region of Mineralnye Vody in 
the Caucasus is effected in accordance with an edict of the 
Russian Federation president. 
<H5>  15. Information Backup for the Privatization Process </H5>
  15.1. At regional level, property management committees and 
property funds are obliged to channel at least 10 percent of the 
revenue they receive from privatization into publicity and 
information work. 
  15.2. The carrying out of propaganda-publicity, information, 
and educational work is the responsibility of the Russian 
Goskomimushchestvo, the Russian Federal Property Fund, and local 
property management committees and property funds. 
  The aforesaid organs, which carry out privatization, are 
given the following obligations to ensure the publication of: 
  --information about the essence of privatization, the role 
of 
privatization checks, the ways they can be used, check auctions, 
and investment funds in the newspapers; 
  --information about the course of privatization, including 
check auctions, the place and time they are held, and 
enterprises which take part in them, in the bulletin on 
privatization, "The Bulletin of the Russian Federal Property 
Fund," which is the joint publication of the Russian Federal 
Property Fund and the Russian Goskomimushchestvo and is 
published using these organizations' resources; 
  --schedules for holding check auctions, information about 
the 
role of privatization in the center and the localities, the use 
of privatization checks, the procedure for acquiring shares of 
privatized enterprises, investment funds, and the course of 
holding check auctions in special mass circulation brochures. 
  15.3. The Russian Goskomimushchestvo and the Russian Federal 
Property Fund, and property committees and funds in the 
localities are entrusted with ensuring, on television and radio: 
  --regular presentation in news programs of information about 
the course of sales for privatization checks and the most 
significant facilities submitted for sale; 
  --regular broadcasts containing information about imminent 
sales. 
  15.4. All mass media which receive subsidies from budgets at 
all levels are obliged to publish, free of charge, news reports 
about facilities at all levels of ownership which are being 
privatized, to the tune of up to 10 percent of the size of the 
grants given to them. 
  15.5. The Russian Goskomimushchestvo, together with the 
Russian Federal Property Fund and other interested 
organizations, is obliged to ensure the publication, free of 
charge, of announcements in "The Bulletin of the Russian Federal 
Property Fund" of auctions and investment temders being held. 
<H3>  16. Social Protection of Workers in Organs Carrying Out 
Privatization </H3>
  16.1. With the aim of raising the prestige of work in organs 
carrying out privatization and raising the interest of their 
workers in the high-quality performance of their duties: 
  --obligatory state personal insurance is to be established 
for them from the monies of budgets at all levels and revenue 
from privatization; 
  --they are to be provided with means of individual 
protection 
according to the list ratified by the leader of the 
privatization organ as agreed with the Russian Federation 
Ministry of Internal Affairs, acquired from the monies of organs 
carrying out the privatization, and to organize training for 
handling them. 
  16.2. It is to be laid down that: 
  --on the abolition of property management committees and 
property funds at all levels, workers keep an allowance worth 
one year's earnings which is paid out of the relevant budgets; 
  --in the event of the death of an employee in connection 
with 
the execution of official work, the family is paid a one-time 
subsidy worth double the annual earnings of the deceased from 
the monies of the relevant budget; 
  --if an employee sustains severe physical injury which rules 
out the possibility of further professional work, a one-time 
subsidy worth one year's earnings is paid out of the monies of 
the relevant budget, plus, for a 10-year period, the difference 
between the official salary and the pension; 
  --if an employee sustains less serious physical injuries, a 
one-time monetary alowance worth five months' average salary is 
paid from the monies of the relevant budget. 
  Damage caused to the property of an employee in connection 
with official work is fully compensated from the monies of the 
relevant budget, this sum subsequently being recovered from the 
culprits and paid into the relevant budget. 
<H5>  17. Privatization and Structural Policy </H5>
  17.1. The procedure and conditions for granting preferential 
targeted state credits on a competitive basis extends to 
privatized enterprises involved in carrying out comprehensive 
federal programs: 
  --for supplementing circulating capital; for investment 
needs; 
  --for the implementation of programs for the conversion of 
the defense industry; 
  --for the protection of the environment; 
  --for other needs determined by the Russian Federation 
Government, including subsidizing imported purchases from 
centralized currency funds. 
  The procedure for conducting specialized competitions for 
obtaining preferential credits is determined by a statute to be 
ratified by the Russian Federation government. 
  17.2. No form of restriction for privatized enterprises is 
permitted in allocating budget appropriations from the Russian 
Federation republic budget for the financing of centralized 
capital investments and obtaining monies from statewide budget 
funds. 
  17.3. In the event of exposure of a case of discrimination 
by 
ministries and departments in respect of the involvement of 
privatized enterprises in carrying out comprehensive federal 
targeted programs, the granting of preferential targeted state 
credits, the allocation of budget targeted allocations, and the 
implementation of other statewide measures, disciplinary and 
material proceedings are brought against leaders of ministries 
and departments in accordance with Russian Federation 
legislation, going as far as dismissal from their posts. 
  17.4. The main way in which shares are sold by joint-stock 
companies following a restricted subscription and specialized 
check auctions are investment tenders, the procedure for holding 
which is regulated by the Program and a statute to be ratified 
by the Russian Goskomimushchestvo. 
  17.5. The creation and registration of financial-industrial 
groups is carried out according to the procedure established by 
Edict No. 2096 of the Russian Federation president dated 5 
December 1993 "On the Creation of Financial-Industrial Groups in 
the Russian Federation." 
  A financial-industrial group means a group of enterprises 
with interconnected capital incorporating specialized financial 
institutions for the purpose of solving common problems. 
  The activity of nonregistered financial-industrial groups is 
prohibited. 
<H5>  Appendix No. 2 to the Program </H5>
<H3>  The Interrepublic Program for the Privatization of State and 
Municipal Enterprises in Areas of the Far North and Equivalent 
Localities </H3>
  The Interrepublic Program for the Privatization of State and 
Municipal Enterprises in Areas of the Far North and Equivalent 
Localities elaborated in accordance with the Russian Federation 
Law "On the Privatization of State and Municipal Enterprises in 
the Russian Federation" and the Russian Federation Supreme 
Soviet Decree "On Putting into Effect the State Privatization 
Program for State and Municipal Enterprises in the Russian 
Federation for 1992" determines the objectives and establishes 
the particulars governing the granting of concessions and the 
implementation of privatization, as well as restrictions, 
proceeding from the possibility of privatizing facilities and 
enterprises located in the region in question. 
  The program is an inalienable part of the State Program for 
the Privatization of State and Municipal Enterprises in the 
Russian Federation and supplements it by creating a system of 
measures taking into consideration the regional features 
involved in carrying out the privatization in the Far North and 
equivalent localities. 
  1. The Provisions of the Program Extend to State and 
Municipal Enterprises Located on the Following Territories 
  --the Republic of Altay -- Kosh-Agachskiy and Ulaganskiy 
Rayons; 
  --the Republic of Buryatiya -- the city of Severobaykalsk; 
Barguzinskiy, Bauntovskiy, Kurumkanskiy, Okinskiy, Muyskiy, and 
Severo-Baykalskiy Rayons; 
  --the Komi Republic; 
  --the Republic of Karelia -- the city of Kostomuksha; 
Belomorskiy, Kemskiy, Loukhskiy, Kalevalskiy, Muezerskiy, and 
Segezhskiy Rayons; 
  --the Republic of Sakha (Yakutia); 
  --Krasnoyarsk Kray -- Evenkiyskiy and Taymyrskiy 
(Dolgano-Nenetskiy) autonomous okrugs; the cities of Igarka, 
Lesosibirsk, Norilsk, and Yeniseysk; and Boguchanskiy, 
Yeniseyskiy, Kezhemskiy, Motyginskiy, Severo-Yeniseyskiy, and 
Turukhanskiy Rayons; 
  --Maritime Kray -- the city of Dalnegorsk; Dalnegorskiy, 
Kavalerovskiy, Olginskiy, and Terneyskiy Rayons; the working 
settlement of Vostok; Boguslavetskiy, Vostretsovskiy, 
Dalne-Kutskiy, Izmaylikhinskiy, Melnichnyy, Roshchinskiy, and 
Tayezhnenskiy rural soviets in Krasnoarmeskiy Rayon; 
  --Khabarovsk Kray -- the cities of Amursk, 
Komsomolsk-na-Amure, Nikolayevsk-na-Amure, and Sovetskaya Gavan; 
Ayano-Mayskiy, Okhotskiy, Vaninskiy, Verkhnebureinskiy, 
Komsomolskiy, Nikolayevskiy, Polina Osipenko, 
Sovetsko-Gavanskiy, Solnechnyy, Tuguro-Chumikanskiy, and 
Ulchskiy Rayons; Amurskiy Rayon, including the working 
settlement of Elban; and Voznesenskiy, Paalinskiy, Achanskiy, 
Dzhuenskiy, and Alminskiy Rural Soviets; 
  --Chukotka Autonomous Okrug; 
  --Amur Oblast -- the cities of Tynda and Zeya; Zeyskiy, 
Selemdzhinskiy, and Tyndinskiy Rayons; 
  --Arkhangelsk Oblast, Irkutsk Oblast -- the cities of 
Bratsk, 
Vodaybo, Ust-Ilimsk, and Ust-Kut; Vodaybinskiy, Bratskiy, 
Kazachinsko-Lenskiy, Katangskiy, Kirenskiy, Mamsko-Chuyskiy, 
Nizhneilimskiy, Ust-Ilimskiy, and Ust-Kutskiy Rayons; 
  --Kamchatka Oblast; 
  --Magadan Oblast; 
  --Murmansk Oblast; 
  --Perm Oblast -- Komi-Permyatskiy autonomous okrug; 
Gaynskiy, 
Kosinskiy, and Kochevskiy Rayons; 
  --Sakhalin Oblast; 
  --Tomsk Oblast -- the cities of Kedrovyy, Kolpashevo, and 
Strezhevoy; Aleksandrovskiy, Bakcharskiy, Verkhneketskiy, 
Kargasokskiy, Kolpashevskiy, Krivosheinskiy, Molchanovskiy, 
Parabelskiy, Teguldetskiy, and Chainskiy Rayons; 
  --Tyumen Oblast -- Yamalo-Nenetskiy and Khanty-Mansiyskiy 
autonomous okrugs; Uvatskiy Rayon; 
  --Chita Oblast -- Kalarskiy, Tungiro-Olekminskiy, and 
Tungokochenskiy Rayons; 
  --all the islands in the Arctic Ocean and its seas, as well 
as the islands in the Bering and Okhotsk Seas. 
  The requirements established by the present Program are 
binding on the organs of state power and administration of the 
Russian Federation, republics within the Russian Federation, 
krays, oblasts, autonomous okrugs, and the local self-government 
organs located in areas of the Far North and equivalent 
locations. 
  Questions of the privatization of facilities not determined 
by the present Program are regulated by provisions of the State 
Program for the Privatization of State and Municipal Enterprises 
in the Russian Federation and local privatization programs. 
<H5>  2. Specific Features of the Objectives of Privatization </H5>
  In parallel with the main objectives of privatization in the 
Russian Federation, as indicated in Section 1 of the State 
Program for the Privatization of State and Municipal Enterprises 
in the Russian Federation, the following are additional 
objectives of privatization in regions of the Far North and 
equivalent localities: 
  --to attain a rational combination of the traditional 
economic complex of the northern peoples and industrial 
production; 
  --to assist the rational employment of the population and 
the 
social development of the regions; 
  --to create real conditions for ensuring the exercise of the 
right to own property by the population inhabiting regions of 
the Far North and equivalent localities, as well as by 
communal-economic collectives, enterprises, and individuals from 
the small peoples of the North. 
<H5>  3. Additional Limitations on Privatization </H5>
  3.1. The privatization of facilities and enterprises in the 
sphere of culture, physical culture, and sports located in the 
Arctic Zone of the Far North, in places of residence and 
economic activity of small peoples of the North, and 
prospectors' settlements is prohibited. 
  3.2. In the process of privatizing enterprises, 
organizations, and their structural subsidiary components 
appearing on the books of enterprises working on the 
expeditionary/duty tour method in regions of the Far North and 
equivalent localities, including freight-carrying motor vehicle 
transport enterprises, as well as enterprises carrying freight 
on the expeditionary/duty tour method, the privatization 
decision is made directly by the Russian Goskomimushchestvo on 
the basis of conclusions by the Russian Federation State 
Committee for the Socioeconomic Development of the North and the 
appropriate sector ministry, department, or committee. 
  3.3. The participation of foreign investors in the 
privatization of facilities and enterprises in the trade 
network, public catering, and everyday services, as well as of 
small enterprises in industry, the construction industry, and 
motor vehicle transport (with a book value of up to R1 million 
as at 1 January 1992) is permitted only by decision of organs of 
local self-government and -- in places inhabited by small 
peoples of the North -- and by agreement with regional 
associations of small peoples of the North. 
  Decisions permitting foreign investors to participate in the 
privatization of facilities in the fuel and energy complex or 
the extraction and processing of ores, precious and semiprecious 
stones, precious metals, and radioactive and rare-earth elements 
are made by the Russian Federation Government or the governments 
of the Republic of Altay, the Republic of Karelia, the Republic 
of Komi, the Republic of Buryatia, and the Republic of Sakha 
(Yakutia) (depending on the type of property) simultaneously 
with the adoption of decisions allowing the privatization of the 
aforementioned facilities and enterprises. 
  3.4. Decisions on the privatization of facilities and 
enterprises in the traditional economic complex of the peoples 
of the North are made in coordination with the regional 
associations of small peoples of the North and representatives 
of the collectives of small peoples of the North. 
  The term facilities and enterprises in the traditional 
economic complex of the peoples of the North means enterprises 
at which at least half of labor collective members come from 
small ethnic communities belonging to the indigenous population 
of the territory in question, which are located in places of 
residence and economic activity of small peoples of the North, 
and which use the byproducts of traditional occupations 
(reindeer-breeding, hunting, catching fish and marine animals, 
picking plants growing in the wild) as initial raw material for 
the production of their output, as well as production 
infrastructure facilities serving the aforementioned 
enterprises, including enterprises for the processing and 
storage of reindeer hides, antler velvet, and subproducts, or 
for the processing of fish, marine animals, and marine products, 
enterprises and workshops for the separation of reindeer pelts 
and the processing of and manufacture of articles from pelts, 
and enterprises for the manufacture of folk art and craft 
articles, the sewing of fur clothing and footwear, and the 
preparation of medicinal-biological compounds. 
<H5>  4. Enterprises Liable to Mandatory Privatization </H5>
  The following are liable to mandatory privatization: 
  --enterprises working ore deposits with small reserves, 
including previously abandoned deposits and deposits considered 
substandard, with the exception of enterprises for the 
extraction of precious metals and precious stones; 
  --mothballed enterprises in all sectors of the national 
economy, with the exception of enterprises in the precious 
metals and precious stones industry, including property left 
over following the winding up of an enterprise. 
<H5>  5. Specific Features of the Choice of Privatization Method </H5>
  The following are taken into account when determining the 
privatization method: 
  --the size of the enterprise (average numerical strength of 
the work force and the book value of fixed assets) and its 
socioeconomic importance for the resolution of tasks affecting 
Russia as a whole and the territory in question; --the 
specific sector features of the enterprise being privatized; the 
expediency of preserving the enterprise's specialization, the 
ecological situation in the zone of the enterprise's activity; 
the monopoly position of enterprises in the zone of their 
activity as regards the consumers of their goods and services 
and their suppliers of material resources; 
  --the need for investments, including foreign investments; 
  --the opinion of the labor collective of the enterprise 
being 
privatized; 
  --the opinion of the regional associations of small peoples 
of the North and representatives of the economic collectives of 
small peoples of the North, if the facilities being privatized 
are located actually in places of residence and economic 
activity of small peoples of the North. 
<H5>  6. Additional Methods of Privatization </H5>
  6.1. In the course of privatization of enterprises in the 
traditional economic sphere of the peoples of the North (where 
the book value of fixed capital on 1 January 1992 was more than 
R1 million) by means of their becoming open-type joint-stock 
companies, all members of the labor collective are granted the 
right to receive free ordinary (voting) shares totaling up to 50 
percent of the value of the authorized capital. These shares are 
distributed among members of the labor collective by decision of 
a meeting (conference) of the collective. 
  The other shares are distributed as follows: 
  --29 percent -- for sale at restricted-access check 
auctions, 
for which the procedure is determined by the Russian Federation 
Government; 
  --the remaining shares -- for sale at auctions for money, 
among inhabitants of republics within the Russian Federation, 
krays, oblasts, or autonomous okrugs wholly or partially 
belonging to regions of the Far North. In this case, an 
enterprise workers' flotation fund is not formed. 
  6.2. In the course of privatization of enterprises in the 
traditional economic sphere of the peoples of the North (where 
the book value of fixed capital on 1 January 1992 was less than 
R1 million), a partnership formed from not less than half the 
total number of workers is granted the right to acquire the 
enterprise at the residual book value within three months of 
approval of the enterprise privatization plan. 
  In the event that the enterprise workers refuse, 
privatization is effected at auction or on a competitive basis 
in line with Russian Federation legislation. 
  6.3. It is stipulated that when shares in enterprises in the 
petroleum and petroleum refining industry and petroleum products 
support services sphere are sold under privatization plans to 
the population of petroleum extraction regions who belong to the 
small peoples of the North and to members of the labor 
collectives of enterprises and associations for the 
transportation of petroleum and petroleum products at 
specialized restricted-access check auctions held in accordance 
with the Statute approved by the Russian Goskomimushchestvo, the 
said categories of citizens may be represented by specialized 
check investment funds which have accumulated their 
privatization checks. In this case, the said funds have a duty 
to prove to the vendors -- the appropriate property funds or 
their representatives -- that their stockholders (not counting 
the founders) are exclusively citizens in the abovementioned 
categories. 
  6.4. On the privatization of trade, public catering, and 
everyday services enterprises located in specified regions of 
the Far North and equivalent localities (in accordance with a 
list drawn up by the Russian Federation State Committee for the 
Social and Economic Development of the North and agreed with the 
Russian Goskomimushchestvo), by decision of the appropriate 
property management committees, it is permitted to sell them by 
tender under the following obligatory conditions: the level of 
sale of specific types of goods, operations, and services, 
taking into account existing demand, must be maintained for a 
period of three years; interruption of the operation of the 
privatized facility for more than two months following the sale 
and purchase and (or) for a total of six months in a calendar 
year is prohibited; reductions in the working hours of the 
privatized facility must be agreed with the local 
administration; and in addition, the buyer must meet one of the 
following conditions: 
  --prevention of a reduction in the volume of production 
(services); 
  --compliance with established ecological norms and 
restoration of environmental damage sustained; 
  --financing of the construction of nature conservation 
facilities and facilities in the social sphere; 
  --maintenance of the number of jobs, including the 
reservation of jobs for representatives of the small peoples of 
the North; 
  --investment, in the necessary volume, in the development of 
production. 
  6.5. The privatization of mothballed facilities and 
mothballed enterprises in the extraction industry is effected 
exclusively at investment competitions, for money, with a 
50-percent discount, and with compliance with obligatory 
conditions for investments in nature conservation operations and 
in the demothballing of the enterprise within six months of the 
acquisition of the ownership title. 
  6.6. The privatization of enterprises deemed ecologically 
dangerous is effected solely by commercial or investment tender 
(for privatization checks prior to 1 July 1994 and for money 
after 1 July 1994), with the obligatory condition of investment 
in improving the ecological condition of the environment, in 
accordance with a list drawn up by the Russian Federation 
Ministry of Environment and Natural Resources and the Russian 
Federation State Committee for the Social and Economic 
Development of the North and approved by the Russian 
Goskomimushchestvo. 
  6.7. In the course of privatization of state and municipal 
enterprises located in regions of the Far North and equivalent 
localities, on the proposal of the labor collective and with the 
consent of local self-government organs, it is permitted to 
include in the property to be privatized social, cultural, and 
consumer facilities that are on the enterprise's books. 
  6.8. When airports of regional and local significance, 
transportation enterprises serving the Arctic zone of the Far 
North, seaports of regional and local significance, and other 
ports [portopunktov] become open-type joint-stock companies and 
the decision is adopted to retain a block of shares in state 
(municipal) ownership, the shares are transferred to the control 
of the organs of power of the components of the Russian 
Federation. 
  6.9. In the course of privatization of state and municipal 
enterprises located in regions of the Far North and equivalent 
localities, members of their labor collectives and persons of 
equivalent status enjoy the concessions stipulated in the State 
Program for the Privatization of State and Municipal Enterprises 
in the Russian Federation, depending on the chosen method of 
privatization, plus the additional concessions defined in the 
present Program. 
  6.10. In determining the size of compensation payments to 
labor collectives which do not receive the ownership title on 
the basis of the results of tendering, the minimum monthly wage 
laid down by Russian Federation legislation is used, calculated 
per worker and taking into account the regional coefficient and 
percentage supplement to wages. 
  6.11. The right to concessionary acquisition of shares in 
open-type joint-stock companies formed on the basis of 
enterprises located in regions of the Far North and equivalent 
localities is extended to the enterprise's former workers who 
had worked at the privatized enterprise for a period of service 
of not less than five years for men and three years six months 
for women. 
  6.12. Labor collectives of enterprises where production is 
seasonal and which carry out primary processing of agricultural 
raw materials, fish, and seafood, privatized in accordance with 
local programs, are granted a postponement of scheduled payments 
for privatized facilities during the period of the major influx 
of such raw material and the corresponding increase in 
circulating capital, until such time as accounts for the sale of 
output have been settled, but for not more than six months. 
  6.13. In the course of privatization of mining industry 
enterprises located in regions of the Far North and equivalent 
localities, the concessions stipulated by the present Program 
for members of their labor collectives are also extended to 
former workers at the said enterprises who worked there for at 
least five years for men and three years six months for women, 
irrespective of their place of residence, and to those members 
of prospecting artels leasing the property of the said 
enterprises who have worked there for at least five seasons. 
  6.14. If an enterprise is located outside the regions of the 
Far North and equivalent localities but carries out work on the 
basis of the expeditionary/duty tour method accounting for at 
least 75 percent of its total volume of operations (services), 
the concessions granted to collectives of enterprises located in 
regions of the Far North and equivalent localities are extended 
to the members of the said enterprise's collective. In the event 
that individual subsidiary components of an enterprise operate 
according to the expeditionary/duty tour method, the concessions 
stipulated for workers in regions of the Far North and 
equivalent localities are extended to the workers of such 
subsidiary components, provided that the subsidiary component in 
question acquires the status of a legal entity in the process of 
privatization of the enterprise. The said concessions are not 
extended to the enterprise's other subsidiary components. 
<H3>  7. Measures of Social Protection for the Population in the 
Process of Privatization </H3>
  7.1. Funds coming into the Federal Enterprise Support Fund 
may also be spent on granting one-time resettlement grants for 
persons traveling to regions of Russia where there is a manpower 
shortage or to the countryside in connection with the loss of 
their job. 
  7.2. In the event that the terms of privatization stipulate 
that a proportion of jobs be retained for the small peoples of 
the North, associations of the small peoples of the North are 
granted the right to monitor the conditions of hiring and 
employment of members of the small peoples of the North both at 
enterprises in their traditional economic sphere and at other 
enterprises located in the areas of residence and economic 
activity of the small peoples of the North. 
<H3>  8. Procedure for Mutual Relations Among State Organs 
Effecting Privatization </H3>
  8.1. In the course of the adoption of decisions on the 
privatization of state and municipal property in the areas of 
residence and economic activity of the small peoples of the 
North, account is taken of the opinion of regional associations 
of small peoples of the North representing the interests of 
ethnic groups. 
  8.2. Russian Federation ministries and departments draw up 
and coordinate with the Russian Federation State Committee for 
Antimonopoly Policy and Support for New Economic Structures, and 
submit to the Russian Goskomimushchestvo, recommendations taking 
into account the peculiarities of enterprises located in regions 
of the Far North and equivalent localities in the course of 
privatization and of the exercise of the property owner's powers. 
  8.3. Where regional bodies effecting privatization (property 
management committees and property funds) located in regions of 
the Far North and equivalent localities have a financial 
deficit, the Russian Goskomimushchestvo and the Russian Federal 
Property Fund grant them financial assistance. 
<H3>  9. Formation of Special-Purpose Financial Funds From 
Resources Obtained Through Privatization </H3>
  9.1. Financial resources obtained from privatization and 
becoming available to the corresponding local self-government 
organs, other than funds formed in accordance with the State 
Program for Privatization of State and Municipal Enterprises in 
the Russian Federation, are channeled into the formation of the 
following special-purpose funds for regions of the Far North and 
equivalent localities: 
  --a fund for the support of persons who have lost their jobs 
and wish to move to regions of Russia where there is a manpower 
shortage, or to engage in agricultural activity. The fund's 
resources are to be spent on paying for travel and resettlement 
of migrants; 
  --a fund for the implementation of nature conservation 
measures; 
  --a fund for the economic and cultural development of the 
small peoples of the Far North. 
  9.2. The procedure for the formation and expenditure of 
special-purpose funds and the amount of resources directed to 
the said purposes are determined by the Russian Federation 
Government. 
<H5>  10. Requirements for Local Privatization Programs </H5>
  10.1. Local programs for the privatization of state and 
municipal enterprises located in regions of the Far North and 
equivalent localities are drawn up by the appropriate property 
management committees of republics within the Russian 
Federation, krays, oblasts, the autonomous oblast, autonomous 
okrugs, cities (other than cities under rayon jurisdiction), and 
rayons (other than rayons within cities) and are adopted by the 
appropriate local self-government organs taking into account the 
opinions of associations of the small peoples of the North 
insofar as the environment in which they live and work is 
affected. 
  10.2. Local privatization programs must be drafted 
(redrafted) in accordance with the requirements of the present 
Program and approved (reapproved) not later than one month after 
its publication. Local programs must be published in the press 
organs of the appropriate local self-government organs and 
submitted to the Russian Goskomimushchestvo. 
  10.3. Local programs must: 
  --not conflict with the State Program for Privatization of 
State and Municipal Enterprises in the Russian Federation or 
with the present Program; 
  --not include proposals for the privatization of enterprises 
that are not eligible for privatization or impose additional 
restrictions on the privatization of enterprises; 
  --include lists of specific enterprises (groups of 
enterprises) eligible for privatization, with special 
identification of enterprises located in areas of residence and 
economic activity of the small peoples of the North; 
  --include predictions of the funds to be obtained from 
privatization and the procedure and areas of their use; 
  --take account of the heterogeneous nature of the territory 
within administrative-territorial formations on the basis of 
natural and climatic parameters, their level of development, and 
their accessibility to transport; 
  --contain specific measures for demonopolization and the 
creation of a competitive environment by agreement with the 
appropriate territorial administrations of the Russian 
Federation State Committee for Antimonopoly Policy and Support 
for New Economic Structures; social protection for the 
population; support and development of enterprise; and 
protection of the environment, with the use of extrabudgetary 
funds and foreign investments for that purpose. 
  The property management committees of republics within the 
Russian Federation, krays, oblasts, the autonomous oblast, 
autonomous okrugs, cities, and rayons (other than rayons within 
cities), with the consent of the appropriate organs of state 
power and administration of the Russian Federation and local 
self-government organs, may make amendments to republic and 
local privatization programs. 
  Monitoring of the fulfillment of local programs for the 
privatization of state and municipal enterprises located in 
regions of the Far North and equivalent localities is the 
responsibility of the Russian Goskomimushchestvo and the Russian 
Federation State Committee for Social and Economic Development 
of the North. 

